<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89418-0003 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.4-18-89.f2.A1002</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">10 CFR Parts 2, 50, 51, 52, and 170</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 3150-AC61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Early Site Permits; Standard Design Certifications; and Combined Licensesfor Nuclear Power Reactors</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Nuclear Regulatory Commission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Nuclear Regulatory Commission is now adding a newpart to its regulations which provides for issuance of early site permits,standard design certifications, and combined construction permits and operatinglicenses with conditions for nuclear power reactors. The new part setsout the review procedures and licensing requirements for applications forthese new licenses and certifications. The final action is intended toachieve the early resolution of licensing issues and enhance the safetyand reliability of nuclear power plants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>May 18, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Documents relative to this final rule may be examinedand copied for a fee at the NRC Public Document Room, 2120 L Street NW,Washington, DC.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Steven Crockett, Attorney, Officeof the General Counsel, telephone (301) 492-1600, on procedural matters,or Jerry Wilson, Office of Nuclear Regulatory Research, telephone (301)492-3729, on technical matters, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington,DC 20555.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>The Commission has long sought nuclear power plant standardization andthe enhanced safety and licensing reform which standardization could makepossible. For more than a decade, the Commission has been adding provisionsto 10 CFR Part 50 and Part 2 that allow for limited degrees of standardization,and for as many years, the Commission has been proposing legislation toCongress on the subject. The Commission was frequently asked by Membersof Congress to what extent legislation on the subject was necessary, andin doing the analysis necessary to reply to these questions, the Commissioncame to believe that much of what it sought could be accomplished withinits current statutory authority. Thus the Commission embarked on standardizationrulemaking.The rulemaking process has been lengthy and highly public. A year and ahalf ago, the Commission announced its intent to pursue standardizationrulemaking in its Policy Statement on Nuclear Power Plant Standardization(52 FR 34884; September 15, 1987). The Policy Statement set forth the principlesthat would guide the rulemaking and provided for a forty-five-day commentperiod on the Policy Statement. On October 20, 1987, about mid-way throughthe comment period the NRC staff held a public workshop on the Policy Statement.During the Workshop, the staff presented a detailed outline of the proposedrule and answered preliminary questions about it. A transcript of the workshopmay be found in the Commission's public document room, Gelman Building,2120 L Street, NW, Washington, DC. After a lengthy internal considerationof the comments received on the Policy Statement and the outline of therule presented at the Workshop, and after public briefings of the Commissionand the Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguards (ACRS), the Commissionissued a proposed rule (53 FR 32060; Auguest 23, 1988) and provided fora sixty-day comment period. The comment period was extended to 75 dayson October 24, 1988 (53 FR 41609). Mid-way through that period the NRCstaff again held a public workshop, this time on the text of the proposedrule.\1\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Given this lengthy and public process, the Commissionis unpersuaded by commenters on the proposed rule who claim that the publicwas not given enought time to consider the rule. For example, the NuclearInformation Resource Service (NIRS) says that given the importance of therule, one ``would think that the NRC would encourage the widest possiblepublic participation on this rule, perhaps even by making special effortsto solicit comment.'' That is, of course, precisely what the Commissiondid.During the second, 75-day comment period, the Commission received over70 sets of comments, ranging from one-page letters to multi-paged documents,one of which included an annotated rewrite of the whole rule. The commentersincluded the Department of Energy (DOE), agencies and offices in the statesof Connecticut, Indiana, New York, and North Carolina, the Nuclear UtilityManagement and Resources Council (NUMARC), the American Nuclear EnergyCouncil, Westinghouse, General Electric, Combustion Engineering, Stoneandamp; Webster, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce, the Union of Concerned Scientists(UCS), the Nuclear Information and Resource Service (NIRS), the Ohio Citizensfor Responsible Energy (OCRE), the Maryland Nuclear Safety Coalition, andseveral utilities, corporations, public interest groups, and individuals.All the comments may be viewed in the agency's public document room.The Commission has carefully considered all the comments and wishes toexpress its sincere appreciation of the often considerable efforts of thecommenters. While the broad outlines, and even many of the details, ofthe proposed rule remained unchanged in the final rule, few sections ofthe proposed rule have escaped revision in light of the comments, and somehave been thoroughly revised. In the remainder of this section of thisfinal rule preamble, the Commission makes two general responses to commentsand then summarizes both the comments and its responses to them. In SectionII of this final rule preamble, the Commission responds to comments onthe chief issues raised by the comments. While Section II often toucheson the broad policies which lie behind the rule, readers wishing to knowmore about those broad policies may consult the statement of considerationswhich was published with the proposed rule. In Section III, which proceedssection-by-section through the final rule, the Commission notes minor changesand offers some minor clarifications of the meaning of some provisions.For a complete record of the differences between the proposed rule andthe final rule, readers may consult the comparative text of the final rule,which is available in the agency's public document room.Two General Responses to CommentsBefore summing up the comments and the Commission's responses to them,the Commission wishes to make clear what it has not tried to do in thisrulemaking. First, although this is an important rulemaking, it does notresolve all the safety, environmental, and political issues facing nuclearpower. The Commission received urgings to undertake deep reforms beforeissuing this final rule. The Commission was, for instance, urged to streamlinethe hearing procedures in 10 CFR Part 2, Subpart G, restructure the utilities'liabilities under the Price-Anderson Act, decide once and for all whatsafety criteria shall be applied to all future plants, solve the problemof nuclear waste, turn all health and safety regulation_not just the NRC's_overto the states, reconsider whether economic considerations should ever enterinto safety decisions, conduct local running referenda on whether a givennuclear power plant should be built, and have Congress directly reviewdesigns. In sum, the Commission was urged to do everything before it didanything.However, the Commission has stuck to the simple aim in this rulemakingof providing procedures for the standardization of nuclear power plantsand more generally for the early resolution of safety and environmentalissues in licensing proceedings. The Commission has declined to tie thefate of this rulemaking to the progress of the agency's many other ongoingefforts, such as revision of the agency's hearing procedures, implementationof the Policy Statement on Safety Goals (51 FR 30028; August 21, 1986),development of techniques of analysis of risk and cost, and preparationfor the licensing of a high-level waste repository. The final rule necessarilytouches on substance whenever it sets forth requirements for the technicalcontent of applications for early site permits, design certifications,or combined licenses, or discusses the applicability of existing standardsto new designs and new situations. But even here, the Commission has avoidedestablishing new safety or environmental standards, although the Commissionmay choose to adopt additional safety standards applicable to new designsprior to the advent of design certifications.Second, many saw this rule as the occasion for arguments over the futureviability of nuclear power in the United States. On the one hand, the Commissionis vigorously accused of promoting the nuclear industry and shutting localgovernments and individual citizens out of the licensing process. On theother hand, the Commission is told that the licensing process is ``thereason'' for ``the loss of the nuclear option'', and that reform of thatprocess is the ``sine qua non'' of the viability of that option.Certainly, the Commission hopes that this rule will have a beneficial effecton the licensing process. In other words, the Commission hopes that efforthas not been wasted on a rule which will never be used. But the Commissionis not out to secure, single-handedly, the viability of the industry orto shut the general public out. The future of nuclear power depends notonly on the licensing process but also on economic trends and events, thesafety and reliability of the plants, political fortunes, and much else.The Commission's intent with this rulemaking is only to have a sensibleand stable procedural framework in place for the consideration of futuredesigns, and to make it possible to resolve safety and environmental issuesbefore plants are built, rather than after.Summary of the Comments and the Commission's ResponsesThe comments on the proposed rule are characterized both by their broadagreement that standardization and early resolution of licensing issuesare desirable, and by their often deep differences on what kinds of designsshould be certified, how they should be certified, and what consequencescertification should have for the licensing process.As to what kinds of designs should be certified, except for the very fewwho opposed any licensing of any nuclear power plant, no commenter opposesthe certification of designs which differ significantly from the designswhich have been built thus far; but some; UCS, for instance, say that only``advanced'' designs should be certified, and many, including UCS, DOE,and Westinghouse, say that only designs for whole plants should be certified.While not withholding certification from incomplete designs or designswhich are not advanced, the final rule has moved a long way from the positionthe Commission took in the legislative proposal it made shortly beforethis rulemaking began. There, certification was held out only for evolutionarylight water designs, but was permitted for the design of any ``major portion''of a plant. The final rule provides for certification of advanced designsand permits certification of designs of less than full scope only in highlyrestricted circumstances.As to how designs should be certified, most commenters think the Commissionhas authority to certify either by rule or by license. However, some commenterssee advantages in certification by license. OCRE, for instance, says thatcertification by license is more appropriate, and some industry commentersthink that more protections are available to the holder of a design licensethan are available to the ``holder'' of a design rule. Some commentersprefer certification by license because they believe that a hearing ona license has to be a formal adjudication.The final rule reflects the Commission's long-standing preference for certificationby rulemaking (see the old 10 CFR Part 50, Appendix 0, paragraph 7), andfor certification hearing procedures which, while they permit formal procedureswhen needed, do not assume that formal procedures are the best means forresolving every safety issues.Finally, the deepest differences among the commenters concern the consequencesof standardization and other devices for early resolution of licensingissues for the licensing process. One commenter believes that, once a plantis built under a combined license, there need be no hearing at all beforeoperation begins. Several of these commenters characterize the proposedrule's provision for an opportunity for a hearing just before operationas the old two-step licensing process under a different name. Others believenot only that there should be such a hearing but also that resolution ofissues in earlier proceedings does not entail any restriction on the issueswhich may be raised in the hearing after construction. Many of these commentersattribute to the Commission an intent to do away with public participationin the licensing process.The Commission has given more consideration to this issue than to any otherprocedural question raised by the proposed rule. As a result, the proposedrule's provisions on hearings just before operation have been revised inthe final rule (the revised provisions are discussed in more detail below).However, the final rule still provides for an opportunity for a hearingon limited issues before operation under a combined license. But the merefact of this opportunity does not mean that the rule is hiding the oldtwo-step process under a different name. By far the greater part of theissues which in the past have been considered in operating license hearingswould, under the new rule, be considered at the combined license stageor in a certification proceeding, including the bulk of emergency planningissues. Similarly, the mere fact that any hearing prior to operation wouldbe limited does not mean that the Commission is attempting to remove thepublic from the licensing process. The rule does not prevent the publicfrom participating in the resolution of any operating license issue. Itsimply moves the bulk of the issues up front in the licensing process tothe design certification, early site permit, and combined license partsof the process.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. The Principal Issues</ITAG>1. Requirements for Applications for Design CertificationBecause design certification is the key procedural device in Part 52 forbringing about enhanced safety and early resolution of licensing issues,the Commission begins its discussion of the principal issues with responsesto comments on the proposed rule's requirements for applications for certification.<ITAG tagnum="81">a. ``Advanced'' Designs</ITAG>The proposed rule provided for certification both of evolutionary light-waterdesigns, that is, improved versions of the light-water designs now in operation,and of ``advanced'' designs, that is, designs which differ significantlyfrom the evolutionary light-water designs, or which incorporate, to a greaterextent than evolutionary light-water designs do, simplified, inherent,passive, or other innovative means to accomplish their safety functions(the distinction between evolutionary light-water designs and advanceddesigns is discussed at greater length below). The proposed rule requiredthat some advanced designs could not be certified until full-scale prototypesof them were built and tested. While agreeing with the requirement forprototype testing of some advanced designs, several commenters, UCS prominentamong them, say that certification should be held out only to advanceddesigns. UCS argues that without such a limitation on the designs whichcould be offered up for certification, the proposed rule would discriminateagainst the development of advanced designs of greater safety, because,given the choice between seeking certification of a familiar design andseeking certification of a design which the Commission might require tobe tested in a full-scale prototype, an applicant would choose to avoidhaving to build a prototype.As is noted above, the rule, unlike the legislative proposals which precededit, provides for certification of advanced designs. However, it also providesfor certification of evolutionary light-water designs. The Commission'slegislative proposals on standardization have always focused on these designs,on the grounds that the light-water designs now in operation provide ahigh degree of protection to public health and safety. Moreover, the Commissiondoes not believe that the requirement in some cases for a prototype issuch a burden. Whatever burden having to test a prototype may be, the burdenmay be lessened by agreements of cost-sharing among utilities and otherorganizations, and by licensing the prototype for commercial operation.It is well to remember also that, under the rule, prototype testing isrequired only for certification or an unconditional final design approval,if at all. A final design approval under 10 CFR Part 52, Appendix O (formerlyin Part 50) can be granted subject to conditions requiring prototype testing.See 10 CFR Part 52, Appendix O, paragraph 5. Moreover, a licensed prototypemay be replicated.<ITAG tagnum="81">b. Requirement to Address Unresolved Safety Issues and Safety Goals</ITAG>Several commenters object to the proposed rule's requirement that applicantsfor certification propose technical resolutions of Unresolved Safety Issuesand high- and medium-priority Generic Safety Issues. This requirement,and similar ones relating to probabilistic risk assessments and the Commission'sThree Mile Island requirements for new plants, 10 CFR 50.34(f), were announcedin the Commission's Severe Accident Policy Statement (50 FR 32138; August8, 1985) and in the Commission's Policy Statement on Standardization (52FR 34884; September 15, 1987). Some commenters call it ``inappropriate''to impose this burden on applicants. Others say that no resolution of oneof these issues should be imposed on a design unless the resolution hadpassed a cost-benefit test.The Commission believes that it is not inappropriate to require that anapplicant for certification show either that a particular issue is notrelevant to the design proffered in the application, or that the applicanthas in hand a design-specific resolution of the issue (the applicant isof course not required to propose a generic resolution of the issue). Asto cost-benefit tests, the Commission will of course apply them to theresolution of safety issues where the resolutions are being imposed onexisting plants and adequate protection is already secured. See 10 CFR50.109 and <T3>UCS </T3>v. <T3>NRC, </T3>824 F.2d 108 (D.C. Cir. 1987). However, initial certificationdoes not involve backfitting. Designers will, of course, strive for a cost-effectivedesign, but the Commission declines to incorporate a cost-benefit testin the standards for certification.<ITAG tagnum="81">c. Requirements on Scope of Design and on Prototypes</ITAG>In the statement of considerations accompanying the proposed rule, theCommission noted that the proposed rule permitted certification of incompletedesigns only in limited cases, while the legislation the Commission hadproposed to the 100th Congress had been less stringent about scope of design.The Commission invited comment on whether the final rule should returnto the policy reflected in the proposed legislation. DOE, Westinghouse,and UCS, among others, argue that only designs of complete power plants_excludingsite-specific elements of course_should be certified. NUMARC, however,advocates a return to the policy of the legislation proposed to the 100thCongress. One engineering firm argues that requiring complete designs wouldlimit market forces that could contribute to standardization.The final rule is even more stringent about completeness of design thanthe proposed rule was. The final rule's provisions on scope, see andSection;52.47, reflect a policy that certain designs, especially designs whichare evolutions of light-water designs now in operation, should not be certifiedunless they include all of a plant which can affect safe operation of theplant except its site-specific elements. See andSection; 52.47(b). Examplesof designs which are evolutions of currently operating light-water designsare General Electric's ABWR, Westinghouse's SP/90, and Combustion Engineering'sSystem 80+. Full-scope may also be required of certain advanced designs,namely, the ``passive'' light-water designs such as General Electric'sSBWR and Westinghouse's AP600. Considerations of safety, not market forces,constitute the basis for the final rule's requirement that these designsbe full-scope designs. Long experience with operating light-water designsmore than adequately demonstrates the adverse safety impact which portionsof the balance of plant can have on the nuclear island. Given this experience,certification of these designs must be based on a consideration of thewhole plant, or else the certifications of those designs will lack thatdegree of finality which should be the mark of certification.However, the Commission has not adopted UCS's position that no design ofincomplete scope could ever be certified. There is no reason to concludethat there could never be a design which protects the nuclear island againstadverse effects caused by events in the balance of plant. The final ruletherefore provides the opportunity for certification of designs of lessthan complete scope, if they belong to the class of advanced designs. SeeandSection; 52.47(b). Examples of designs in this class include the passivelight-water designs mentioned above and non-light-water designs such asGeneral Electric's PRISM, Rockwell's SAFR, and General Atomic's MHTGR.But here too the rule sets a high standard: Certification of an advanceddesign of incomplete scope will be given only after a showing, using afull-scale prototype, that the balance of plant cannot significantly affectthe safe operation of the plant.Standardization along these lines may indeed limit some market forces,particularly those which encourage a highly differentiated range of products.However, the final rule's requirements on scope in no way limit innovativearrangements among vendors and architect-engineers for bringing new designsbefore the Commission.The final rule is clearer than the proposed rule was in identifying thosedesigns which cannot be certified without a program of testing. For purposesof determining which designs must undergo a testing program to be certified,the rule distinguishes between all advanced designs_be they passive light-wateror non-light water_and evolutionary light-water designs. Some testing maybe required of all advanced designs. Passive light-water designs are tosome extent also evolutions of the light-water designs now licensed, butthey have design features which are not present on plants licensed andoperating in the United States. Therefore the rule requires that the maturityof the passive light-water designs be demonstrated through a combinationof experience, appropriate tests, or analyses, but most likely not throughprototype testing. See andSection; 52.47(b)(2). While analyses may be reliedupon by the staff to demonstrate the acceptability of a particular safetyfeature which evolved from previous experience or to justify the acceptabilityof a scale model test, it is very unlikely that an advanced design wouldbe certified solely on the basis of analyses. Prototype testing is likelyto be required for certificaton of advanced non-light-water designs becausethese revolutionary designs use innovative means to accomplish their safetyfunctions, such as passive decay heat removal and reactivity control, whichhave not been licensed and operated in the United States. See id.<ITAG tagnum="81">d. Certification by Rulemaking</ITAG>The proposed rule provided for design certification by rulemaking. Herethe proposed rule was in accord with the old 10 CFR Part 50, Appendix O,paragraph 7 (this paragraph is now being replaced by Subpart B of Part52). However, in the notice of proposed rulemaking, the Commission invitedcomments on whether certification should be by license rather than rule.Although the Commission expressed some doubts on the matter, commentersgenerally agree that the Commission has the authority to license designs.Some industry commenters and some public interest groups alike go furtherand argue that certification by license is preferable. Industry commentersarguing this position believe that the rights and obligations which attachto a license are clearer than those which attach to a rule. For instance,a license is possessed by some entity and, under Commission law, cannotbe transferred without that entity's consent. Some public interest groupsprefer certification by license because they believe that the hearing ona license would have to be a formal adjudication.The Commission continues to believe that certification by rule is preferableto certification by license. As DOE says, a design certification will,like a rule, have generic application. Moreover, certification by rulemakingleaves the Commission free to adapt hearing procedures to the requirementsof the subject matter, rather than rely exclusively on formal adjudicatorydevices even when they are not useful (hearing procedures are more fullydiscussed below). Finally, certification by rulemaking permits the Commissionto consider reactor designs submitted by foreign corporations. However,the Commission will give priority to designs for which there is a demonstratedinterest in the United States. The Commission will review other designsas resources permit.For the reasons just given, the final rule retains provisions for certificationby rulemaking. Westinghouse suggests also adding provisions for certificationby license, leaving it to the applicant to choose between certificationby license and certification by rulemaking. The Commission, however, prefersrulemaking and sees no advantage to providing such an option.NUMARC, while supporting certification by rule, suggests adding provisionsanalogous to existing provisions in 10 CFR Part 50 for transfer or revocationof a license. See 10 CFR 50.80 and 50.100. However, a rule certifying adesign does not, strictly speaking, belong to the designer. Therefore,such a rule cannot be transferred or revoked by adjudicatory enforcement.Applying andSection; 50.80, in particular, to a rule certifying a designwould be akin to giving the vendor of the design a patent, but the Commissionhas no authority to issue patents.Nonetheless, the vendor whose design is certified by rule is not withoutprotection. Section 52.63(a), the Administrative Procedure Act, and, ultimately,judicial review protect the vendor against arbitrary amendment or recissionof the certification rule, and the law of patents and trade secrets protectsthe vendor against unlawful use of the design. In order to give the vendormore opportunity to treat elements of the design as trade secrets, thefinal rule provides that proprietary information contained in an applicationfor design certification shall be given the same treatment that such informationwould be given in a proceeding on an application for a construction permitor an operating license under 10 CFR Part 50. See andSection; 52.51. Moreover,an applicant referencing a design certification and seeking to use a designerother than the designer which achieved the certification would have tocomply with andSection;andSection; 52.63(c) and 52.73, and the other designerwould have to pay a portion of the cost of review of the application forcertification. See 10 CFR 170.12 (d) and (e), as amended in this document.<ITAG tagnum="81">e. Applicability of Existing Standards</ITAG>With one exception, the proposed rule did not say what safety standardswould be applied to a design proffered for certification, or even preciselywhat existing information requirements applicants would have to meet.\2\<NOTE/> In its lengthy and highly detailed comments, NUMARC proposesadding to the rule a large number of highly specific cross-references toPart 50, and a statement that no other portions of Part 50 apply.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The proposed rule did state that an application for certificationwould have to demonstrate that the design compiled with the technicallyrelevant portions of the Commission's Three Mile Island requirements setforth in 10 CFR 50.34(f). See andSection; 52.47(a), 53 FR 32073 (proposedrule).The final rule provides that the standards set out in 10 CFR Part 20, Part50 and its appendices, and Parts 73 and 100 will apply to the new designswhere those standards are technically relevant to the design proposed forthe facility. See new andSection; 52.48. Application of Parts 20, 50, 73,and 100 to the certification of new designs, as reflected in andSection;52.48, should go a long way toward establishing the regulatory standardthat new designs must meet, and thereby provide the regulatory stabilitythat is an essential prerequisite to realizing the benefits of standardization.The Commission recognizes that new designs may incorporate new featuresnot addressed by the current standards in Parts 20, 50, 73 or 100 and that,accordingly, new standards may be required to address any such new designfeatures. Therefore, the NRC staff shall, as soon as practicable, advisethe Commission of the need for criteria for judging the safety of designsoffered for certification that are different from or supplementary to currentstandards in 10 CFR Parts 20, 50, 73, and 100. The Commission shall considerthe NRC staff's views and determine whether additional rulemaking is neededor appropriate to resolve generic questions that are applicable to multipledesigns. The objective of such rulemaking would be to incorporate any newstandards in Part 50 or Part 100, as appropriate, rather than to developsuch standards in the context of the Commission's review and approval ofindividual applications for design certifications. On the other hand, newdesign features that are unique to a particular design would be addressedin the context of a rulemaking proceeding for that particular design.<ITAG tagnum="81">f. Hearings on Applications for Design Certifications</ITAG>Like the proposed rule, the final rule provides for notice and commentrulemaking on an application for a design certification, together withan opportunity for an informal hearing on an application for a design certification.The rule also permits the use of more formal procedures where they arethe only procedures available for resolving a given issue properly. SeeandSection; 52.51. UCS and others argue that any hearing on certificationshould be a formal adjudication. In particular, UCS argues that the certificationproceeding will be dealing with adjudicative, as opposed to legislative,facts and therefore should be fully adjudicatory. UCS characterizes adjudicativefacts as ``uniquely related to activities of the parties that are at issue''and legislative facts as ``facts about industry practices, economic impact,scientific data, and other information about which the parties have nospecial information.''UCS' argument proves too much. If the facts to be considered in a certificationproceeding are wholly adjudicative, then, because those facts are likethe facts considered in any rulemaking on safety issues, every such rulemakingmust be a formal adjudication. However, this conclusion is clearly notthe law; therefore, the facts in a certification proceeding are not whollyadjudicatory. Moreover, if such facts must be categorized at all, theyare more ``legislative'' than ``adjudicative'', as UCS defines those terms,for while they are ``related to activities of the parties'', they are notuniquely so, and they are facts about ``industry practices, scientificdata'', engineering principles, and the like.Several commenters also argue that the certification proceeding shouldbe a formal adjudication because cross-examination is an unsurpassed meansfor discovering the truth. Again, the argument proves too much, namely,that every rulemaking, indeed every species of lawmaking, should be formaladjudication. Part 52 does not assume the superiority, or even the usefulness,of formal procedures for resolving every issue; but it does provide fortheir use where they are the only means available for resolving an issueproperly.<ITAG tagnum="81">g. Fees for Review of Applications</ITAG>The final rule adheres to the fee policy embodied in the proposed rule.An applicant for design certification does not have to pay an applicationfee, but the applicant will have to pay the full cost of the NRC reviewof the application, although not until the certification is referencedin an application for a construction permit or combined license, or, failingthat, not until the certification expires. The details of the scheme ofdeferral of the fees appear in conforming amendments to the recently amended10 CFR Part 170 (53 FR 52632; December 29, 1988).UCS asserts that the provision for deferral of fees for NRC review is ``unconscionable''.To the contrary, the Commission believes that there is nothing ``unconscionable''about deferral of fees for a program whose aim is to enhance safety.Some industry commenters assert that the requirement for payment of thefull cost of NRC review presents an ``insurmountable disincentive'' tothe development of certified designs. Some industry commenters proposeputting a ceiling on fees for certification review, in order to help vendorsbetter estimate the costs of developing and certifying a design. The Commissionfully recognizes that it will be difficult for a vendor to estimate thecosts of taking a design through to certification. However, a ceiling onfees only displaces the burden of that uncertainty from the vendor to thepublic. In recent years, the NRC has been obliged by statute to chargefees which return to the Federal Treasury a portion of the costs incurredin regulation. Deferral of fees is more in line with the policies behindthose statutes than is putting the burden of uncertainty on the public.<ITAG tagnum="81">h. Finality</ITAG>Standardization has the double aim of enhancing safety and making it possibleto resolve design issues before construction. Of these two aims, enhancedsafety is the chief, because pre-construction resolution of design issuescould be achieved simply through combined construction permits and operatinglicenses with conditions. Achievement of the enhanced safety which standardizationmakes possible will be frustrated if too frequent changes to either a certifieddesign or the plants referencing it are permitted.The proposed rule put forward principally three means of preventing a continualregression from standardization. First, the proposed rule required thatany amendment proffered by the ``holder'' of a certification be consideredin a notice and comment rulemaking and granted if the amendment compliedwith the Atomic Energy Act and the Commission's regulations. Second, theproposed rule prohibited the licensee of a plant built according to a certifieddesign from making any change to any part of the plant which was describedin the certification unless the licensee had been granted an exemptionunder 10 CFR 50.12 from the rule certifying the design. Third, the proposedrule stated that the Commission would not backfit a certified design orthe plants built according to it unless a backfit were necessary to assurecompliance with the applicable regulations or to assure adequate protectionof public health and safety. See andSection; 52.63 of the proposed rule,53 FR 32074, col. 3, to 32075, col. 2. The Commission invited comment onwhether the amendment and exemption standards were stringent enough, andon whether the backfitting standard gave certifications a reasonable degreeof finality. See 53 FR 32067, col. 2.The comments focus on the standard of amending the certification, one groupof comments wanting to make it harder for the ``holder'' of a certificationto get an amendment, and another group wanting to make it easier. Severalcommenters say that the proposed rule wrongly makes it easier for the designerto amend the certified design than it is for the Commission to backfitthe design. To correct this perceived imbalance, UCS, among others, proposesthat no amendment be granted unless it constitutes a safety enhancement,and that any amendment granted be backfitted on all plants built accordingto the design being amended. OCRE proposes that, at a minimum, no amendmentshould be granted which would entail a decrease in safety. On the otherside, NUMARC proposes virtually the same standard as a maximum: Any amendmentwhich has no safety impact should be granted. DOE in effect argues thatthe Commission does not have authority to ask for more than OCRE's minimum,because this type of amendment would be proposed for economic, plant efficiency,or other business reasons and the NRC has no expertise or authority inareas involving business judgments. The law firm of Bishop, Cook, Purcell,and Reynolds, representing several utilities, proposes a backfitting standardmore stringent than the one in the proposed rule: The Commission shouldnot impose backfits on a design for the sake of compliance with applicableregulations unless the lack of compliance has an adverse impact on safety.Going even further in the same vein, the U.S. Chamber of Commerce proposesthat even where the lack of compliance has an adverse impact on safety,the backfit should have to pass muster under a cross-benefit analysis.The final rule places a designer on the same footing as the Commissionor any other interested member of the public. No matter who proposes it,a change will not be made to a design certification while it is in effectunless the change is necessary to bring the certification into compliancewith Commission regulations applicable and in effect when the certificationwas issued, or to assure adequate protection of public health and safety.See andSection; 52.63(a)(1). Thus, the final rule cannot be said to makeit easier for a designer to amend a certification than for the Commissionto backfit the design. But more important, the final rule thus providesgreater assurance that standardization and the concomitant safety benefitswill be preserved.The Commission is not adopting Bishop, Cook's suggestion that compliancebe required only when non-compliance would have an adverse impact on safety.Licensees seeking relief from a design certification, who believe thatnon-compliance would have no adverse impact on safety, should request anexemption under 10 CFR 50.12. Neither is the Commission adopting the suggestionof the U.S. Chamber of Commerce that cost-benefit analysis be used to determinewhether to impose backfits on designs to bring them into compliance withapplicable regulations. The Atomic Energy Act allows the Commission toconsider costs only in deciding whether to establish or whether to enforcethrough backfitting safety requirements that are not necessary to provideadequate protection. See <T3>UCS</T3> v. <T3>NRC</T3>, 824 F.2d 108, 120 (1987).The final rule, like the proposed rule, permits applicants for combinedlicenses issued under the rule, and licensees of a plant built accordingto a certified design, to request an exemption under 10 CFR 50.12 froma rule certifying a design. Among the comments on the appropriateness ofusing andSection; 50.12 in the standardization context were NIRS' commentthat andSection; 50.12 permitted exemptions at a ``whim'' and DOE's suggestionthat no exemptions should be granted at all. Out of respect for the unforeseen,the Commission has decided to adhere to andSection; 50.12, but the finalrule does require that, before an exemption can be granted, the effectwhich the exemption might have on standardization and its safety benefitsmust be considered.As a further guard against a loss of standardization, the final rule, againlike the proposed rule, also prohibits a licensee of a plant built accordingto a certified design from making any change to any part of the plant whichis described in the certification unless the licensee has been grantedan exemption under 10 CFR 50.12 from the rule certifying the design. Becausethe certification is a rule, 10 CFR 50.12, not 50.59, is the standard fordetermining whether the licensee may make changes to the certified portionof the design of the plant without prior approval from the NRC. NUMARCsays that, given the practicalities of construction and the limited resourcesof the NRC staff, licensees need the flexibility afforded by andSection;50.59. However, the Commission believes that the certifications themselvesand andSection; 50.12 will provide the necessary flexibility with respectto the certified portion of the plant (or at least as much flexibilityas is consistent with achieving the safety benefits of standardization),while andSection; 50.59 will continue to apply to the uncertified portion.How much flexibility andSection; 50.12 will provide depends in large parton how much detail is present in a design certification, and just how muchis present will be an issue which will have to be resolved in each certificationrulemaking. The Commission does expect, however, that there will be lessdetail in a certification than in an application for certification, andthat a rule certifying a design is likely to encompass roughly the samedesign features that andSection; 50.59 prohibits changing without prior NRCapproval. Moreover, the level of design detail in certifications shouldafford licensees an opportunity to take advantage of improvements in equipment.The comments on the proposed rule raise two other important finality issues,both connected with backfitting. The first bears on the criteria for renewalof a design certification. The proposed rule provided that the Commissionwould grant a request for renewal of a design certification if the designcomplied with regulations in effect at renewal and any more stringent safetyrequirements which would bring about a substantial increase in safety ata cost justified by the increase (strictly speaking, the backfit rule wouldnot apply at renewal, but the proposal nonetheless incorporated the backfitrule's cost-benefit standards). See andSection; 52.59(a), 53 FR 32074, col.3. Bishop, Cook, among others, proposes that the standard for renewal becompliance with regulations in effect not at renewal but rather at thetime the certification was originally issued, together with any other morestringent requirements which are justified under the backfit rule. Theproposed rule's criteria were in fact equivalent to Bishop, Cook's in theirimpact on a given design certification, but they differed in their impacton the timing of some backfit analyses, the proposed rule providing thatsome would be done in rulemakings while the given certification was ineffect. However, the final rule adopts Bishop, Cook's proposal becauseit more clearly says that imposition of more stringent requirements ona design during a renewal proceeding will be governed by backfit standards.The second of the other important finality issues raised by the commentsconcerns the finality of 10 CFR Part 52, Appendix O (formerly in Part 50)final design approvals (FDAs) already in effect on the effective date ofthis rule. Section 52.47(a)(2) of the proposed rule stated that holdersof FDAs in effect on the effective date of the rule might have to submitmore information to the staff in connection with the review for certification.NUMARC proposes adding a ``grandfather'' clause which would prohibit theCommission from imposing, during the certification proceeding, any changeon that part of the design which is covered by an already effective FDAunless the change meets the criteria of the backfit rule.Adoption of NUMARC's proposal would not only entail a significant changein the force of an FDA, it would also extend the range of application ofthe backfit rule. Under existing NRC regulations, an FDA binds the staffin a licensing proceeding but not in a certification proceeding; and evenin a licensing proceeding, the staff may, on the grounds of significantnew information or other good cause, reconsider an earlier determination.See 10 CFR Part 52, Appendix O, paragraph 5. Moreover, the FDA does notbind the Commission or the Commission's adjudicatory panels. Id. at paragraph6. The backfit rule applies to any proposal which would require the holderof an FDA to meet a new standard in order to remain in possession of theFDA, see 10 CFR 50.109(a)(1), but the backfit rule does not change theforce an FDA has in a licensing proceeding or certification proceeding.NUMARC's proposal, however, would bind both the staff and the Commissionin a certification proceeding and would add a cost-benefit test to thetests which must be met before a determination made in an FDA could bereconsidered. NUMARC's proposal thus would effectively amend both the backfitrule and the cited paragraphs of Appendix O: It would, in effect, turnany existing FDA into a partial certification. Here the Commission wouldrather adhere to the finality provisions in the existing regulations, includingAppendix O and the backfit rule. The Commission believes that, in thissituation, these provisions adequately balance the need for finality withthe need for flexibility to deal with unforeseen safety advances or risks.2. Early Site PermitsWhat design certification is to the early resolution of design issues,the early site permit is to the early resolution of site-related issues.Both the certification and the permit make it possible to resolve importantlicensing issues before a construction permit proceeding. They in effectmake possible the banking of designs and sites, thereby making the licensingof a given plant more efficient. However, some commenters question whetherthe Commission should issue early site permits. The Attorney General ofNew York, for instance, sees no need for early site permits and questionswhether there could be grounds adequate to support approval of a site fortwenty years, the term of early site permits under the proposed rule (thefinal rule provides that permits will have terms of between ten and twentyyears). He points out that under the NRC's current regulations, NRC earlydecisions on site suitability issues raised in connection with a constructionpermit generally remain effective for only five years. See 10 CFR 2.606and 10 CFR Part 52, Appendix Q (formerly in Part 50), paragraph 5. TheConnecticut Siting Council strongly suggests that the State of Connecticutwould be unable to participate in an NRC hearing on an application foran early site permit unless the application proposed a ``specific'' nuclearpower plant. Finally, one commenter is concerned that land approved underan early site permit might never be used for a nuclear power plant, andthus development of the land for a non-nuclear use would have been needlesslydelayed.The Commission believes that early site permits can usefully serve as vehiclesfor resolving most site issues before large commitments of resources aremade. Moreover, the Commission believes that a term of ten to twenty yearsfor early site permits will make early site permits more useful for earlyresolution of site issues than would the five-year term in 10 CFR 2.606and 10 CFR Part 52, App. Q, because the longer term will require less frequentreassessments of issues than would the shorter term. The five-year termis a function not of the reliability of the information available to makethe decisions, but rather of the fact that the decisions made under thoseprovisions may only resolve isolated site issues \3\<NOTE/> and anticipate site utilization in the very near term. TheCommission is confident that there will be information adequate to supportsite approvals lasting up to 20 years. After all, the Commission licensesplants and their sites for operation for periods of up to twice twentyyears. Where adequate information is not available, early site permitswill not be issued.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ Thus, the Commission declines to follow the suggestionof the engineering firm of Stone andamp; Webster that partial early sitepermits be issued. It is not likely that resolutions of isolated site issuescould have the degree of finality which a permit lasting ten to twentyyears must have.The Commission is also confident that enough information on reactor designwill be available in an early site permit proceeding to permit sound judgmentsabout environmental impacts and thus to enable state and local agenciessuch as the Connecticut Siting Council to participate effectively in anearly site permit proceeding. The Council says that for it to meaningfullyparticipate in a decision on an application for an early site permit, theapplication would have to contain ``projected emission, discharges, siteimpacts, safety factors, and exact operational parameters * * * proposedfor a site''. It is just such information which both the proposed ruleand the final rule would require of applicants for early site permits.See andSection; 52.17(a).Last, although the Commission acknowledges the possibility that non-nucleardevelopment of a site would be postponed when a site is reserved for anuclear plant and then a plant never built there, the Commission believesthat such a possibility does not loom very large. Persons are not likelyto go to the expense of applying for an early site permit unless thereis a good prospect that the site will be used for a nuclear power plant.Moreover, it may be that many of the sites for which early site permitsmight be sought are already set aside for use by utilities; thus, eventhough non-nuclear development of the site might be postponed, non-utilityuses of the site would not be. Last, even during the period in which anearly site permit is in effect, non-nuclear uses of the site are not prohibitedaltogether. See andSection; 52.35.The comments on the proposed rule raise two other important issues concerningthe rule's provisions on early site permits. The first issue concerns thedivision of authority between the Federal government and local governmentsover the siting of nuclear power facilities. The New York State EnergyOffice is concerned that the proposed rule leaves the impression that onlyan early site permit from the NRC is necessary to set aside land for anuclear power plant. To the contrary, the rule does not, indeed, couldnot, change the division of authority between the Federal government andthe states over the siting of nuclear plants. An early site permit constitutesapproval of a site only under the Federal statutes and regulations administeredby the Commission, not under any other applicable laws.The last important issue raised by the comments on early site permits concernsthe proposed rule's requirement that the application contain a plan forredress of the site in the event that the site preparation work and similarwork and similar work allowed by 10 CFR 50.10(e)(1) is performed and thesite permit expires before it is referenced in an application for a constructionpermit or combined license issued under the rule. The proposed rule requiredthat the plan provide reasonable assurance that redress carried out underthe plan would achieve a ``self-maintaining, environmentally stable, andaesthetically acceptable site'' which conformed to local zoning laws. Theonly important difference between the proposed and final rules on thissubject is that the final rule requires such a plan only of applicantswho wish to perform the activities allowed by 10 CFR 50.10(e)(1). NUMARCsays that this requirement is ``inherently unworkable'' and would involvethe Commission in matching redress against a variety of local zoning laws.To the contrary, the rule's provisions on site redress, including the provisionon zoning, are modeled on the redress requirements imposed on the ClinchRiver Breeder Reactor project. See In the Matter of the U.S. Departmentof Energy, et al. (Clinch River Breeder Reactor Plant), LBP-85-7, 21 NRC507 (1985). Moreover, the Commission has long required that applicants'environmental reports discuss compliance with local laws, including zoninglaws. See 10 CFR 51.45(d). Apparently, NUMARC is not opposed to redressper se, for NUMARC's proposed revision of andSection; 52.25 of the proposedrule speaks of the possibility that redress of adverse environmental impactsmight be necessary. The Commission is only requiring that such redressfollow the precedent established at Clinch River and proceed accordingto a plan incorporated in the early site permit. Containing a redress plan,the permit itself will constitute assurance that, if site preparation activitiesare carried out but the site never used for a nuclear power plant, thesite will not be left in an unacceptable condition.3. Combined Licenses<ITAG tagnum="81">a. The Commission's Authority to Issue Combined Licenses</ITAG>There are two important questions in connection with the proposed rule'sprovisions on combined construction permits and operating licenses withconditions. The first is whether the Commission has the authority to issuecombined licenses. The second is whether, in cases where all design issuesare resolved before construction begins, there should be a hearing afterconstruction is complete, and if so, what issues should be considered atthe hearing.Comments on whether the Commission has the authority to issue combinedlicenses tend to mirror the commenters' views on what kind of hearing shouldbe held after construction is complete. In other words, the discussionof this issue tends to be result-oriented. Thus, many who believe thatthere should be a hearing after construction, and that it should be asfull a hearing as operating license hearings often are, argue that theCommission has no authority to issue combined licenses. They claim thatsection 185 of the Atomic Energy Act mandates a two-step licensing process(for the text of section 185, see below). They often cite <T3>Power Reactor Development Co.</T3> v. <T3>International Union of Electrical Workers,</T3> 367 U.S. 396 (1961)as support for this interpretation of section 185. To these arguments,those who believe that there should be no hearing, or else only a highlyrestricted hearing, after construction is complete reply that section 161hof the Atomic Energy Act gives the Commission authority to combine a constructionpermit and an operating license in a single license (for the text of section161h, see below).A closer look at section 161h and 185 shows that section 161h clearly givesthe Commission authority to combine a construction permit and operatinglicense in a single license and that section 185 is not inconsistent withsection 161h. Section 161h says, in pertinent part, that the Commissionhas the authority to ``consider in a single application one or more ofthe activities for which a license is required by this Act [and] combinein a single license one or more of such activities . . .'' 42 U.S.C. 2201.The plain language of this section clearly applies to the combining ofconstruction permits and operating licenses, for both construction andoperation of nuclear power facilities are ``activities for which a licenseis required by this Act'', namely by sections 101 and 185 of the Act, see42 U.S.C. 2231 and 2235, and section 103a of the Act makes any licenseto operate a commercial nuclear power facility ``subject to such conditionsas the Commission may by rule or regulation establish . . .'' See 42 U.S.C.2233. Had Congress intended that construction permits and operating licensesfor commercial nuclear power plants be excluded from the language of section161h, surely Congress would have said so right in that section, for theplain language of that section invites their inclusion, and they are themost important licenses issued under the Act.Section 185 is not to the contrary. Section 185 says, in pertinent part,<ITAG tagnum="21">CONSTRUCTION PERMITS._All applicants for licenses to construct . .. utilization facilities shall . . . be initially granted a constructionpermit. . . . Upon the completion of the construction . . . of the facility,upon the filing of any additional information needed to bring the originalapplication up to date, and upon finding that the facility authorized hasbeen constructed and will operate in conformity with the application asamended and in conformity with the provisions of this Act and of the rulesand regulations of the Commission, and in the absence of any good causebeing shown to the Commission why the granting of a license would not bein accordance with the provisions of this Act, the Commission shall thereuponissue a license to the applicant. . . .</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">42 U.S.C. 2235. To be sure, the section speaks in terms of a constructionpermit's being issued first, and then a license (presumably an operatinglicense). However, the contrast between the two licenses is not fundamentalto the section. The substance of the section is clearly indicated by thetitle of the section and by the list of findings the Commission must make.The section may be paraphrased thus: A construction permit is not a grantof authority to operate once construction is complete; before operationbegins, the original application must be brought up to date, and the Commissionmust make certain affirmative findings. Thus the critical matter is notthe separation of the two licenses, but the need for specific findingsbefore operation. With this substance, both the proposed rule and the finalrule are entirely in accord (the pertinent provisions of the final rulewill be described in more detail below).Moreover, in differentiating between a ``construction permit'' and a later``license'', section 185 is not taking exception to section 161h. Section185 does not say, for instance, ``Notwithstanding anything in section 161hto the contrary, applicants shall be granted initially only a constructionpermit.'' By speaking of a separate issuance of a license after completionof construction, section 185 simply conforms itself to the simplest case,in which the licenses are in their elementary, uncombined states, and avoidshaving to make an already long section longer in order to acknowledge thecase which section 161h makes possible. Moreover, section 185 acknowledgessection 161h implicitly when it speaks not of a separate application foran operating license but simply of an updating of the original application.Therefore, neither the proposed rule nor the final rule can be faultedfor not providing for a separate issuance of an operating license.This interpretation of section 185 is confirmed by the legislative historyof the section. In 1954, when Congress was considering proposed amendmentsto the Atomic Energy Act of 1946, representatives of the industry complainedthat the proposed section 185 required that construction of a facilitybe completed ``under a mere construction permit, without any assuranceat that stage that there will be issued any license to . . . operate itafter it has met all the specifications of the construction permit.'' AtomicEnergy Act of 1954: Hearings on S. 3323 and H.R. 8862 before the JointCommittee on Atomic Energy, 83rd Congress, 2d Session, 113 (May 10, 1954).These representatives proposed instead that power facility applicants shouldbe able to obtain a single license covering all aspects of their activities_construction,possession of fuel, and operation_and that the license should contain theconditions the applicant would have to meet before operation of a constructedfacility could begin. Id. at 113 and 118. On this proposal, the followingcolloquy took place:<ITAG tagnum="21">Representative HINSHAW. That seems to me to be reasonable, that youshould put all the conditions into 1 license that can be put into 1 license.That would be fair enough.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Chairman COLE. Would you mind my interruption? Why cannot that bedone under the terms of the bill as it is now?</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Mr. McQUILLEN [representing Detroit Edison]. I think it undoubtedlywould be so operated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Chairman COLE. Of course it would.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Id. at 119. Chairman Cole said this even though neither of the draftbills before the Committee contained the text of what is now section 161h.Twelve days later, as if to put the matter beyond all doubt, the Committeeincorporated the present text of section 161h into both bills. The finalrule provides for just such a single license, with conditions, as was discussedin this colloquy.<T3>Power Reactor Development Co.</T3> v. <T3>Electrical Workers,</T3> 367 U.S. 396 (1961), is not to the contrary.The issue in that case was not whether the Commission had the authorityto combine a construction permit with an operating license with conditions,but whether the Commission could postpone the ultimate safety findingsuntil construction was complete. The Court ruled that the Commission could,and found support for its conclusion in section 185, which showed, theCourt said, that ``Congress contemplated a step-by-step procedure.'' 367U.S. at 405. But the Court did not say, ``section 185 mandates a separateissuance of an operating license, notwithstanding section 161h.'' The interpretationof section 161h of the Act was not at issue.<ITAG tagnum="81">b. Hearings After Construction Is Complete</ITAG>The first issue concerning hearings after completion of construction undera combined license is whether there should be such hearings at all. Mostcommenters, whatever their affiliation, believe that there should be theopportunity for such hearings. They disagree only over how limited thehearings should be. DOE argues that there should be no such hearings atall. As the principal support for its argument, DOE cites the section ofthe Administrative Procedure Act (APA) which says, in effect, that adjudicationis not required in cases in which the agency decision rests ``solely oninspections, tests, or elections''. See 5 U.S.C. 554(a)(3). Under Part52's provisions of combined licenses, a combined license will contain thetests, inspection, and analyses, and acceptance criteria therefor, whichare necessary and sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that the facilityhas been constructed and will operate in conformity with the license andthe Act. See andSection; 52.97. DOE's argument amounts to the claim thatthe kind of tests and inspections spoken of in Part 52 is the same as thekind of tests and inspections spoken of in the APA.The Commission agrees that findings which rest solely on the results oftests and inspections should not be adjudicated, and the final rule soprovides. See andSection; 52.103. However, not every finding the Commissionmust make before operation begins under a combined license will necessarilyalways be based on wholly self-implementing acceptance criteria and thereforeencompassed within the APA exception. The Commission does not believe thatit is prudent to decide now, before the Commission has even once gone throughthe process of judging whether a plant built under a combined license isready to operate, that every finding the Commission will have to make atthat point will be cut-and-dried_proceeding according to highly detailed``objective criteria'' entailing little judgment and discretion in theirapplication, and not involving questions of ``credibility, conflicts, andsufficiency'', questions which the Court in <T3>UCS</T3> v. <T3>NRC,</T3> 735 F.2d 1437 (D.C. Cir. 1984), held were marks of issueswhich should be litigated at least under the facts of that case. Indeed,trying to assure that the tests, inspections, and related acceptance criteriain the combined license are wholly self-implementing may well only succeedin introducing inordinate delay into the hearing on the application fora combined license.Thus, the question becomes whether the rule should provide an opportunityfor a post-construction hearing on the issues which are not excepted fromadjudication by the APA. Whether the Commission could or should go furtherunder its governing statutes we leave to future consideration and experience;this rule adopts an approach within the bounds of our legal authority whichsets reasonable limits on any post-construction hearing. In this regard,every commenter who believes there should be such an opportunity for hearingalso believes that an issue in the hearing should be whether constructionhas been completed in accord with the terms of the combined license, andthe final rule so provides. Also, under section 185 of the Atomic EnergyAct, the Commission must find, prior to facility operation, that the facilityhas been constructed and will operate in conformity with the applicationand the rules and regulations of the Commission. This statutory finding,in the context of Subpart C of this rule, translates into two separatebut related regulatory findings: that compliance with the acceptance criteriain the combined license will provide reasonable assurance that the facilityhas been constructed and will operate in accordance with the Commission'srequirements, and that the acceptance criteria have in fact been satisfied.The former finding will be made prior to issuance of the combined license,and will necessarily be the subject of any combined license hearing undersection 189a of the Act. The latter finding cannot by its nature be madeuntil later, after construction is substantially complete, and thereforecannot by its nature be the subject of any hearing prior to issuance ofthe combined license. Thus, to the extent that an opportunity for hearingshould be afforded prior to operation, it should be confined to the singleissue that cannot have been litigated earlier_whether the acceptance criteriaare satisfied. No commenter has offered any legal argument to the contrary.\4\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ Section 185 also says that, prior to operation, theremust be an ``absence of good cause being shown to the Commission why thegranting of the license would not be in accordance with the provisionsof the Act.'' We think that this implicit opportunity to show ``good cause''is satisfied by affording an opportunity for hearing on all findings thatwill be made prior to facility operation.Commenters disagree greatly on whether any other issue should be consideredin a hearing. The proposed rule provided that intervenors could contendthat significant new information showed that some modification to the siteor the design was necessary to assure adequate protection. To this, NUMARCresponds that ``no one could seriously consider ordering a new plant withthe licensing uncertainties it would face.'' NUMARC proposes a completerewrite of andSection; 52.103, elements of which are discussed below. Severalindustry commenters point to the ``added burdens'' that applicants wouldbe assuming under the proposed rule as grounds for severely limiting theissues for hearing. Rockwell International, for instance, claims that,with the hearing under andSection; 52.103, there will be four public hearingsfor each plant.Public interest groups also take a dim view of the proposed rule's limitationson the hearing, though their reasons are not the industry's. UCS says thata licensing proceeding without uncertainty is a sham. OCRE goes furtherand asserts that the uncertainty should be distributed equally: ``In aperfectly fair proceeding, [the] chance [of winning] would be 50%.'' TheMaryland Nuclear Safety Coalition counts only two hearings for each plant.NIRS says that many problems with the current generation of reactors werecured under the full two-step licensing process.This latter group of commenters appears to be opposed to any limitationon the post-construction hearing, for not one of them proposes a concretealternative to the proposed rule's provisions on the hearing. UCS doessay that the hearing should encompass ``all issues that are material tothe NRC's approval of an operating license for the plant'', but that statementis either so general as to be just another way to put the question of whatissues should be encompassed, or it is the claim that, when it comes timeto determine whether the plant has been built in conformity with the termsof the combined license, all the operating license issues resolved beforeconstruction should be treated as if they had never been resolved. Manycommenters do in fact seem to be making such a claim, for they contendagainst any limits on the post-construction hearing at the same time thatthey support the idea that design issues should be resolved before construction.There have to be substantial limits on the issues that can be raised afterconstruction. A licensing proceeding without any uncertainty in resultmay be a sham, but the bulk of the uncertainty should be addressed andresolved prior to, not after, construction. Part 52 does not remove uncertainty,it simply reallocates it to the beginning of the licensing process. Thealternative apparently offered by opponents of limits on the post-constructionhearing is, in effect, to double the uncertainty by considering every designissue twice.\5\<NOTE/> To the extent that these commenters offer any practical argumentsin favor of this approach, they are not persuasive. Rockwell Internationalmay engage in some double-counting when it asserts that there are fourpublic hearings for each plant, but when the Maryland Nuclear Safety Coalitionsays that the public can debate licensing issues only in an early sitepermit hearing and after construction, and therefore needs another hearingon design issues, it inexplicably simply ignores the mandatory public hearingon the application for the combined license and the opportunity for a publichearing on an application for a design certification. Moreover, contraryto NIRS, shortcomings in certain plants were not discovered because thelicensing proceedings consisted of two steps but rather because designissues had to be resolved and construction made to conform to design beforeoperation began. Part 52 provides for no less.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Even according to OCRE's notion of a ``perfectly fair''proceeding, in which perfect fairness could be achieved by replacing judgeswith tosses of coins, design issues should not be resolved twice. If theywere, intervenors would have two 50% chances to win_that is, to preventoperation of the plant_on design issues. But two even chances are equivalentto a 75% chance overall (e.g., the chance of coming up heads once in twotosses of a coin is 3 out of 4), and a proceeding in which one party hasa 75% chance of winning is not, according to OCRE, ``perfectly fair''.The final rule adopts a straight-forward approach to limiting the issuesin any post-construction hearing on a combined license. As a matter oflogic, every conceivable contention which could be raised at that stagewould necessarily take one of two general forms. It would allege eitherthat construction had not been completed_and the plant would not operate_inconformity with the terms of the combined license, or that those termswere themselves not in conformity with the Atomic Energy Act and pertinentCommission requirements. The final rule makes issues of conformity withthe terms of the combined license part of any post-construction hearing,unless those issues are excepted from adjudication by the APA exceptionfor findings which are based solely on the results of tests and inspections.The final rule does not attempt to say in advance what issues might fallunder that exception. The comments are nearly unanimous in the opinionthat issues of conformity with the combined license are properly encompassedin any post-construction hearing. Moreover, this limited opportunity forhearing is consistent with the Commission's belief that, even if section185 did not speak at all to the need for a conformity finding, the Commissionitself would need to make such a finding prior to operation in order toconclude, in the language of section 103, that operation is not inimicalto the health and safety of the public. The final rule also provides thatissues of whether the terms of the combined license are themselves inadequateare to be brought before the Commission under the provisions of 10 CFR2.206. This approach to issues concerning the inadequacy of the combinedlicense is well-founded in the discretion afforded the Commission undersection 185 of the Act to determine what constitutes ``good cause'' fornot permitting operation, and in the analogy which this approach has withthe way construction permits are treated in operating license proceedings.Contentions alleging inadequacies in a construction permit are not nowadmissible in an operating license proceeding. Similarly, under the finalrule, contentions alleging inadequacies in a combined license are not admissiblein a post-construction hearing. Moreover, as we noted, this approach fullysatisfies applicable law.<ITAG tagnum="84">III. Other Issues</ITAG>These are taken up section by section. Not discussed are most of the manychanges made to the proposed rule for the sake of clarity, brevity, consistency,specificity, and the like. Worth noting, however, is that this <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice moves Appendices M, N, O, and Q of Part50 to Part 52, so that, except for Subpart F of 10 CFR Part 2, all of theCommission's regulations on standardization and early resolution of licensingissues will be in one part of 10 CFR Chapter I. Readers are reminded thata comparative text showing all deletions from, and additions to, the proposedrule is available in the NRC's public document room.1. Early Site PermitsAt the suggestion of NUMARC and others, andSection; 52.17 now gives applicantsfor early site permits the option of submitting partial or complete emergencyplans, for final approval. Also, the section requires a redress plan onlyof applicants who wish to be able to perform the site preparation workand similar work allowed under 10 CFR 50.10(e)(1). Last, incorporatingsuggestions by UCS and others, the section says what factors should beconsidered in determining whether the area surrounding the site is ``amenable''to emergency planning. To avoid suggesting that the Commission is adoptingnew emergency planning standards, andSection; 52.17 abandons the proposedlanguage of ``amenability to emergency planning'' in favor of languagedrawn from existing regulations on emergency planning.Section 52.18 now makes clear that need for power is not a considerationat the early site permit stage.In a number of places_andSection;andSection; 52.23, 52.53, 52.87, and portionsof other sections_the rule provides explicitly for ACRS review of issuesto make clear that, even though the Atomic Energy Act does not, in terms,give the ACRS a role in the granting of early site permits, design certifications,or combined licenses, the ACRS is to have the same role with respect tothese devices that it does with respect to construction permits, operatinglicenses, and the like. Wherever the ACRS is spoken of in Part 52, theintention is that the ACRS review the pertinent issues according to thestandards specified therein.As in the proposed rule, andSection; 52.25 provides that the holder of anearly site permit which contains a site redress plan, or the applicantfor a construction permit or combined license which references such anearly site permit, may perform the activities at the site allowed by 10CFR 50.10(e)(1) without first obtaining the separate authorization requiredby andSection; 50.10. The New York State Energy Office appears to take thisto mean that the holder of the permit may perform the work without NRCapproval. To the contrary, the early site permit which contains a redressplan is itself NRC approval. The law firm of LeBoeuf, Lamb, Leiby andamp;MacRae, representing several utilities, argues that recent case law, especiallyNRDC v. EPA, 859 F.2d 156 (D.C. Cir. 1988), calls into question the Commission'slimitations on non-safety related construction before issuance of a permit.LeBoeuf, Lamb concludes that andSection; 52.25 and related portions of Part52 should be deleted and the limitations in andSection; 50.10 reviewed inthe light of the case law. The Office of the General Counsel is undertakinga review and will recommend to the Commission if any changes to these sectionsare warranted. In the meantime, the Commission has decided to keep Part52's provisions on site work intact and consistent with the related provisionsin Part 50.Section 52.27 now contains some of the material which appeared in andSection;52.29 of the proposed rule. OCRE objects to the provision in andSection;52.27 which treats an early site permit as valid beyond the date of expirationin proceedings based on applications which have referenced the early sitepermit. OCRE argues that this provision allows clever applicants to avoidnew site requirements by referencing an early site permit just before itexpires. At bottom, this is really an argument that early site permitsshould have shorter durations. The Commission is confident that the agencywill be able to make site judgments which will retain their validity forthe durations provided for in the final rule. However, the final rule doesprovide that the duration of an original permit can be fixed at a termshorter than twenty years. See andSection; 52.27(a).In its comment on andSection; 52.31, LeBoeuf, Lamb suggests that at renewal,the burden should be on the Commission to show why an early site permitshould not be renewed, but that a given permit should be renewed only once,and for not more than ten years. The final rule retains the provisionsof the proposed rule, because they provide more flexibility to both theCommission and holders of permits.Much of the discussion in Sections II.1.f. and II.3.b. above on the finalityof design certifications and hearings after construction is relevant tothe provisions in andSection; 52.39 on the finality of early site permits.Section 52.39 now states that, except in certain limited circumstances,issues resolved in a proceeding on an early site permit shall be treatedas resolved in any later proceeding on an application which referencesthe early site permit. One of the circumstances involves petitions under10 CFR 2.206 that the terms of the early site permit should be modified;andSection; 52.39(a)(2)(iii) assumes that the Commission shall resolve theissues raised by the petition in accordance with the standard in paragraph(a)(1) of the same section.2. Design CertificationsIn the proposed rule, andSection; 52.45 contained material on scope of designand testing of prototypes. This material now appears, in modified form,in andSection; 52.47. The phrase ``essentially complete nuclear power plant,''which is used in 52.45, is defined as a design which includes all structures,systems, and components which can affect safe operation of the plant exceptfor site-specific elements such as the service water intake structure andthe ultimate heat sink. Therefore, those portions of the design that areeither site specific (such as the service water intake structure or theultimate heat sink) or include structures, systems and components whichdo not affect the safe operation of the facility (such as warehouses andsewage treatment facilities) may be excluded from the scope of design.In addition, an essentially complete design is a design that has been finalizedto the point that procurement specifications and construction and installationspecifications can be completed and made available for audit if it is determinedthat they are required for Commission review in accordance with the requirementsof andSection; 52.47(a). Procurement specifications would have to identifythe equipment and material performance requirements and include the necessarycodes, standards, and other acceptance and performance criteria to whichthe equipment and materials will be fabricated and tested. Constructionand installation specifications would have to identify the criteria andmethods by which systems, structures and components are erected or installedin the facility and include acceptance, performance, inspection, and testingrequirements and criteria.In andSection; 52.47, the provisions on testing of prototypes have been rewordedto avoid suggesting a presumption that designs of the affected class couldbe certified only after successful testing of a prototype. One individualand the U.S. Metric Association urged that the rule require that technicalinformation in applications be in metric units. The NRC staff believesthere is much merit in this proposal, but because the public has not hadan opportunity to comment on it, it is not incorporated in the final rule.The NRC staff is considering proposing an amendment to Part 52 on the subjectfor Commission review.On andSection;andSection; 52.53, 52.55, and 52.63, see the remarks in SectionIII.1. above on andSection;andSection; 52.23, 52.27, and 52.39, respectively.Also, andSection; 52.55 of the proposed rule set ten years as the durationof certifications. The final rule extends the duration to fifteen years,to permit more operating experience with a given design to accumulate beforethe certification comes up for renewal or ceases to be available to applicantsfor combined licenses. In addition, andSection; 52.63(a)(3) now limits Commission-orderedmodifications of design-certified elements of a specific plant to situationsin which the modification is necessary for adequate protection and specialcircumstances as defined in 10 CFR 50.12(a) are present. This double requirementdoes not mean that if a specific plant presents an undue risk but no specialcircumstances are present the plant will not be modified. Rather, the modificationwill take place through modification of the certified design itself, asprovided for elsewhere in the same section.Theoretically, it would be possible for an applicant whose applicationreferenced a certified design to select designer(s) other than the designer(s)which had achieved certification of the standard design. Section 52.63(c)makes clear that such an applicant might be required to provide informationwhich is normally contained in procurement specifications and constructionand installation specifications and which is consistent with the certifieddesign and available for audit by the NRC staff. Also, andSection; 52.73requires a demonstration that the new designer is qualified to supply thedesign. Last, the new designer would have to pay a portion of the costof the review of the application for certification. See 10 CFR 170.12(d)and (e), as amended in this document. It is expected, as a practical matter,that applicants referencing a certified design would select the designerwhich had achieved certification of the standard design.3. Combined LicensesSection 52.73 now provides that the entity that obtained certificationfor a design must be the entity that supplies the design to an applicantfor a combined license referencing the design, unless it is demonstratedthat another entity is qualified to supply the design. This provision wasadded because an entity supplying the design should be qualified to doso; the entity which obtained the certification will have demonstratedits qualifications by obtaining the certification.The last sentence of andSection; 52.75 of the proposed rule now appears inandSection; 52.79 of the final rule.DOE proposes redrafting andSection; 52.79 to require that no applicationfor a combined license be considered unless it references a certified design.The final rule does not contain this restriction because there may be circumstancesin which a combined license would properly utilize a non-standard design,and because such a restriction would mean, among other things, that everyprototype would have to be licensed in a fully two-step process. In connectionwith andSection; 52.79's provisions on submission of complete emergency plans,NIRS somehow concludes that Subpart C's provisions on emergency planning``extend'', to the detriment of state and local governments, the ``realism''doctrine set forth in 10 CFR 50.47 and recently affirmed in Commonwealthof Massachusetts v. NRC, 856 F.2d 378 (1st Cir. 1988). Apparently, NIRSbelieves that to settle emeregency planning issues before constructionis to ``extend'' the doctrine. To the contrary, although Subpart C assumesthe ``realism'' doctrine, as it is entitled to do, it does not extend it.The doctrine remains precisely what it is in andSection; 50.47. Moreover,the Commission's aim in drafting Subpart C's provisions on emergency planninghas been to follow to the maximum feasible extent the National Governors'Association's Recommendation, at its 79th annual meeting, in 1987, that``. . . emergency plans should be approved by the NRC before it issuesthe construction permit for any new nuclear power plant.''Section 52.83 now provides that the initial term of a combined licenseshall not exceed forty years from the date on which the Commission makesthe findings required by andSection; 52.103(c).On andSection; 52.87, see the discussion in Section III.1. on andSection; 52.23.NUMARC proposed removing from andSection; 52.89 any reference to design certifications,on the grounds that environmental impact statements should not be preparedin connection with certification rulemakings. The references in this sectionto design certifications are not meant to imply that environmental impactstatements must be prepared in connection with design certifications.Section 52.99 has been reworded to reflect more clearly that the inspectioncarried out during construction under a combined license will be basedon the tests, inspections, analyses, and related acceptance criteria proposedby the applicant, approved by the staff, and incorporated in the combinedlicense. Several industry commenters proposed adding to this section arequirement that the staff prepare a review schedule in connection witheach combined license. However, such a requirement would be largely duplicativeof a long-standing staff practice under which the staff prepares an annualinspection plan which allocates resources according to the priorities amongall pending inspection tasks. The annual plan should assure the timelinessof staff review of construction under a combined license. Section 52.99envisions a ``sign-as-you-go'' process in which the staff signs off oninspection units and notice of the staff's sign-off is published in the<T4>Federal Register</T4>. UCS says that it is ``totally inappropriate''for the Commission, while construction is going on, to sign off on inspectionsand thus put matters beyond dispute which might otherwise be raised afterconstruction is complete. However, UCS has misunderstood the Commission'srole in the inspection process. While construction is going on, only thestaff signs off on inspections. The Commission makes no findings with respectto construction until construction is complete. Section 52.99 has beenmodified to make this point more clearly.UCS and other commenters object to the section in andSection; 52.103 of theproposed rule which provided interested persons thirty days after noticeof proposed authorization of operation in which to request a hearing onthe specified grounds. Yet the thirty-day requirement was drawn from section189a of the Act. Neither the Act nor Part 52 imagines that it would beacceptable for interested persons to wait until notice is received beforethey examine the record of construction. These time periods are like thesixty-day limit in the Hobbs Act, 28 U.S.C. 2344, for petitions for directjudicial review of an agency rule. These limits assume that the petitioneris familiar with the fundamentals of the record before the limited periodbegins. The limited period is then provided for consideration of options,consultation with other interested persons, and drafting of pleadings.In any event, the final rule provides sixty days, in consideration of thepleading standard andSection; 52.103 imposes on petitioners. Moreover, asnoted above, to assist interested persons in becoming familiar with theconstruction record, andSection; 52.99 now provides that notice of staffapprovals of construction will be published periodically in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4> Any hearing held under andSection; 52.103(b)(2)(1)will use informal procedures to the maximum extent practicable and permissibleunder law. In particular, the Commission intends to make use of the provisionsin 5 U.S.C. 554, 556, and 557 which are applicable to determining applicationsfor initial licenses. Under andSection; 52.103(b)(2)(ii), the NRC staff willreview the andSection; 2.206 petition and make appropriate recommendationsto the Commission concerning the petition. The Commission itself will issuea decision granting or denying the petition in whole or in part.Finally, Urenco, Inc., is concerned that the last subsection of andSection;52.103 not be taken to suggest that the Commission would have to make separatefindings for each of the numerous ``modules'' of a gaseous diffusion facility.The issue of how the modules of a gaseous diffusion facility should belicensed is beyond the scope of this rulemaking; andSection; 52.103 thereforecannot suggest that the Commission would have to make separate findingsfor each of the modules of such a facility.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Replicate Plant Concept</ITAG>In the notice of proposed rulemaking, the Commission published a revisedpolicy statement on replication of plants and invited comment on the revisedpolicy. See 53 FR 32067, col. 3, to 32068, col. 1. Several industry commentersremarked that the statement's requirement that the application for replicationbe submitted within five years of the date of issuance of the staff safetyevaluation report for the base plant effectively made replication unavailablefor the short term. They recommended removing the restriction, or at leastlengthening it. The Commission has decided to retain this restriction.The five-year figure is in fact already a lengthening of the analogus figurein the immediately preceding version of the policy statement. The restrictionis a reflection of the Commission's belief that applications which reachback further than a given number years probably ought to be consideredas custom-plant applications.Policy on ReplicationThe replicate plant concept involves an application by a utility for alicense to construct or operate one or more nuclear power plants of essentiallythe same design as one already licensed.The design of the plant already licensed (termed the base plant design)may be replicated at both the construction permit and operating licensestages, and in applications for combined construction permits and operatinglicenses in a one-step licensing process. Replication of an approved baseplant design at the construction permit stage is a prerequisite for itsreplication at the operating license stage. Although replication of thebase plant design at the operating license stage is not mandatory, thatis, the operating license application may be submitted as a custom plantapplication, it is strongly recommended.An application for a replicate plant must demonstrate compliance with thefour licensing requirements for new plant designs as set forth in the Commission'sSevere Accident Policy Statement (50 FR 32138; August 8, 1985).Each application proposing to replicate a previously licsensed plant willbe subjected to a qualification review to determine the acceptability ofthe base plant for replication and to define specific matters that mustbe addressed in the application for the replicate plant. A further requirementfor qualification is that the application for a replicate plant must besubmitted within five years of the date of issuance of the staff safetyevaluation report for the base plant. The qualification review will considerthe following information:(1) The arrangement made with the developers of the base plant design forits replication;(2) The compatibility of the base plant design with the characteristicsof the site proposed for the replicate plant;(3) A description of any changes to the base plant design, with justificationfor the changes;(4) The status of any matters identified for the base plant design in thesafety evaluation report, or subsequently identified by the ACRS or duringthe public hearings on the base plant application as requiring later resolution;(5) Identification of the major contractors, with justification for theacceptability of any that are different than those used by the base plantapplicant; and(6) A discussion of how the replicate plant design will conform to anychanges to the Commission's regulations which have become effective sincethe issuance of the license for the base plant.<ITAG tagnum="84">Environmental Impact_Categorical Exclusion</ITAG>The final rule amends the procedures currently found in Part 50 and itsappendices for the filing and reviewing of applications for constructionpermits, operating licenses, early site reviews, and standard design approvals.As such they meet the eligibility criteria for the categorical exclusionset forth in 10 CFR 51.22(c)(3). That section applies to ``[a]mendmentsto . . . Part [] 50 . . . which relate to (i) procedures for filing andreviewing applications for licenses or construction permits or other formsof permission. . . .'' As the Commission explained in promulgating thisexclusion, ``[a]lthough amendments of this type affect substantive partsof the Commission's regulations, the amendments themselves relate solelyto matters of procedure. [They] . . . do not have an effect on the environment.''49 FR 9352, 9371, col. 3 (March 12, 1984) (final environmental protectionregulations).\6\<NOTE/> Accordingly, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmentalimpact statement or environmental assessment need be prepared in connectionwith these final rules.\7\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ It makes no substantive difference for the purpose ofthe categorical exclusion that the amendments are in a new Part 52 ratherthan in Part 50. The amendments are, in fact, amendments to the Part 50procedures and could have been placed in that part.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ The requirements concerning testing of full-size prototypesof advanced reactors, see andSection; 52.47, may appear not to fit into thecategory excluded by andSection; 51.22(c)(3), since to comply with the requirements,an applicant may have to build and test a prototype plant, an act clearlywith an environmental impact. Nonetheless, andSection; 52.47 is eligiblefor exclusion under andSection; 51.22(c)(3). Unlike, for instance, the promulgationof a safety rule which applies to operating plants, the formal action ofpromulgating andSection; 52.47 has only a potential impact on the environment.That impact becomes actual only if a designer chooses to pursue certificationof a certain kind of advanced design. Under the present circumstances,no meaningful environmental assessment or impact statement can be made.Cf. 49 FR at 9372, cols. 2-3 (entering into an agreement with a State underSection 274 of the Atomic Energy Act has no immediate or measurable environmentalimpact and therefore warrants a categorical exclusion). The issuance ofthe construction permit and operating license for a prototype plant would,of course, be a major federal action with a significant impact on the environment,and would entail the preparation of an environmental impact statement.Cf. id., col. 3 (the States must prepare detailed environmental analysesbefore they license certain activities).<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act Statement</ITAG>This final rule amends information collection requirements that are subjectto the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3>). These requirements have been submitted to the Officeof Management and Budget (OMB) for any review appropriate under the Act.The effective date of this rule provides for the ninety days required forOMB review of the information collection requirements contained in therule.Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average 22,000 hours per response, including the time for reviewinginstructions, searching existing data sources, gathering and maintainingthe data needed, and completing the reviewing the collection of information.Send comments regarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of thiscollection of information, including suggestions for reducing this burden,to the Records and Reports Management Branch, Division of Information SuppportServices, Office of Information and Resources Management, U.S. NuclearRegulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555; and to the Paperwork ReductionProject (3150-0000), Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Analysis</ITAG>As presently constituted, the American population of nuclear power reactorsconsists largely of one-of-a-kind designs. Experience has shown that thehighly individualistic character of this population has consumed enormousresources in the processes of design, construction, and safety review.Because, typically, design of a plant was not complete when constructionof it began, many safety questions were not resolved until late in thelicensing proceeding for that plant. The late resolution of questions introducedgreat uncertainty into proceedings, because the process of resolution oftenentailed lengthy safety reviews, construction delays, and backfits. Moreover,the low incidence of duplication among designs has meant that experiencegained in the construction and operation of a given plant has often notbeen useful in the construction and operation of any other plant, and hasmade the generic resolution of continuing safety issues more complicated.In the face of this experience with a population of unique plants, therehave long been fundamentally only three alternatives for Commission action,the last two of them not mutually exclusive: either make no effort to bringabout an increased degree of standardization, or propose legislation onstandardization, or enact by rulemaking as much of a scheme for promotingstandardization as the Commission's current statutory authority permits.The Commission has for some time concluded against the first alternative,having decided that a substantial increase in standardization would enhancethe safety and reliability of nuclear power plants and require fewer resourcesin safety reviews of plants, and that the Commission should have in placeprovisions for the review of standardized designs and other devices forassuring early resolution of safety questions. The Commission has thereforepursued standardization both by proposing legislation_without success_andby promulgating rules, in particular Appendices M, N, and O to Part 50(now Part 52) of 10 CFR. Lacking legislation on standardization, the Commissionbelieves that the most suitable alternative for encouraging further standardizationis to fill out and expand the Commission's regulatory scheme for standardizationand early resolution of safety issues.Therefore, the Commission now promulgates a new set of regulations, tobe placed in a new part in 10 CFR, Part 52. This new part facilitates theearly resolution of safety issues by providing for pre-construction-permitapproval of power plant sites, Commission certification of standardizeddesigns, and the issuance of licenses which combine permission to constructa plant with permission to operate it once construction of it has beensuccessfully completed. Ideally, a future applicant will reference an approvedsite and a certified design in an application for a combined license, thusobviating the need for an extensive review of the application and construction.The provision in Part 52 for Commission certification of designs has theadditional objective of encouraging the use of standardized designs, therebyadding to the benefits of early resolution the safety benefits of accumulatedexperience and the economic benefits of economies of scale and transferableexperience.Quantification of the costs and benefits of this rulemaking is probablynot possible. Much depends on the extent to which the industry pursuesstandardization. Clearly, if the Commission and the industry spend theresources necessary to certify a score of designs and then no applicantreferences any of them, those resources will have been largely wasted.On the other hand, it is just as clear that if a score of plants uses asingle certified design, there will have been a great saving of the resourcesof the industry, the agency, and the interested public alike. To be addedto the uncertainties surrounding the industry's response, there are alsouncertainties concerning the costs of the certification process, and thecosts of developing the designs themselves, especially the advanced designs,which may require testing of prototypes. However, if the industry findsit in its interest to proceed with the development of nuclear power, thereis every reason to expect that the safety and economic benefits of standardizationwill far outweigh the upfront costs of design and Commission certification:Review time for applications for licenses will be drastically reduced,the public brought into the process before construction, construction timesshortened, economies of scale created, reliability of plant performanceincreased, maintenance made easier, qualified vendor support made easierto maintain, and, most important, safety enhanced.Thus, the rationale for proceeding with this rulemaking: There is no absoluteassurance that certified designs will in fact be used by the utilities;however, it is certain that if the reasonably expected benefits of standardizationare to be gained, then the Commission must have the procedural mechanismsin place for review of applications for early site approvals, design certifications,and combined licenses. The most fundamental choice is, of course, the industry's,to proceed or not with standardization, according to its own weighing ofcosts and benefits. But the Commission must be ready to perform its reviewresponsibilities if the industry chooses standardization.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Flexibility Act Certification</ITAG>The final rule will not have a significant impact on a substantial numberof small entities. The final rule will reduce the procedural burden onNRC licensees by improving the reactor licensing process. Nuclear powerplant licensees do not fall within the definition of small businesses insection 3 of the Small Business Act, 15 U.S.C. 632, the Small BusinessSize Standards of the Small Business Administration in 13 CFR Part 121,or the Commission's Size Standards published at 50 FR 50241 (Dec. 9, 1985).The impact on intervenors or potential intervenors will be neutral. Forthe most part, the final rule will affect the timing of hearings ratherthan the scope of issues to be heard. For example, many site and designissues will be considered earlier, in connection with the issuance of anearly site permit or standard design certification, rather than later,in connection with a facility licensing proceeding. Similarly, a combinedlicensed proceeding will include consideration of many of the issues thatwould ordinarily be deferred until the operating license proceeding. Thus,the timing rather than the cost of participating in NRC licensing proceedingswill be affected. Intervenors may experience some increased preparationcosts if they seek to reopen previously decided issues because of the increasedshowing that will be required. Once a hearing commences, however, an intervenor'scosts should be decreased because the issues will be more clearly definedthan under existing practice. Therefore, in accordance with the RegulatoryFlexibility Act of 1980, 5 U.S.C. 605(b), the Commission hereby certifiesthat the final rule will not have a significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities and that, therefore, a regulatory flexibilityanalysis need not be prepared.<ITAG tagnum="84">Backfit Analysis</ITAG>This rule does not modify or add to the systems, structures, components,or design of a facility; or the design approval or manufacturing licensefor a facility; or the procedures or organization required to constructor operate a facility. However, it could be argued that this rule modifiesand adds to the procedures or organization required to design a facility,since the rule adds to, or else at least spells out, the requirements forapplicants for design certifications. Moreover, the rule, at the very least,substantially modifies the expectations of anyone who had hoped to applyfor a design certification under the previously existing section 7 of Appendix0, particularly of any such who presently hold preliminary or final designapprovals under that Appendix.Nonetheless, the Commission believes that the backfit rule does not applyto this rule and, therefore, that no backfit analysis pursuant to 10 CFR50.109(c) is required for this rule. The backfit rule was not intendedto apply to every action which substantially changes settled expectations.Clearly, the backfit rule would not apply to a rule which would imposemore stringent requirements on all future applicants for construction permits,even though such a rule arguably might have an adverse impact on a personwho was considering applying for a permit but had not done so yet. In thislatter case, the backfit rule protects the construction permit holder,not the prospective applicant, or even the present applicant. The finalrule below is of the character of such a hypothetical rule. The final rulearguably imposes more stringent requirements for design certification andthereby may have an adverse impact on some persons. However, the effectsof the final rule will be largely prospective, and the rule does not requireany present holder of a design approval (no person holds a design certification)to meet new standards in order to remain in possession of such an approval.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>10 CFR Part 2Administrative practice and procedure, Antitrust, Byproduct material, Classifiedinformation, Environmental protection, Nuclear Materials, Nuclear powerplants and reactors, Penalty, Sex discrimination, Source material, Specialnuclear material, Waste treatment and disposal. 10 CFR Part 50Antitrust, Classified information, Fire protection, Incorporation by reference,Intergovernmental relations, Nuclear power plants and reactors, Penalty,Radiation protection, Reactor siting criteria, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements. 10 CFR Part 51Administrative practice and procedure, Environmental impact statement,Nuclear materials, Nuclear power plants and reactors, Reporting and recordkeepingrequirements. 10 CFR Part 52Administrative practice and procedure, Antitrust, Backfitting, Combinedlicense, Early site permit, Emergency planning, Fees, Inspection, Limitedwork authorization, Nuclear power plants and reactors, Probabilistic riskassessment, Prototype, Reactor siting criteria, Redress of site, Reportingand recordkeeping requirments, Standard design, Standard design certification.10 CFR Part 170Byproduct material, Nuclear materials, Nuclear power plants and reactors,Penalty, Source material, Special nuclear material.For the reasons set out in the preamble and under the authority of theAtomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, the Energy Reorganization Act of1974, as amended, and 5 U.S.C. 552 and 553, the Commission is adding to10 CFR Chapter I a new Part 52 and adopting amendments to 10 CFR Parts2, 50, 51, and 170: 1. Part 52 is added to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="56">PART 52_EARLY SITE PERMITS; STANDARD DESIGN CERTIFICATIONS: AND COMBINEDLICENSES FOR NUCLEAR POWER PLANTS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.1 Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.5 Interpretations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.8 Information collection requirements: OMB approval.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_Early Site Permits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.11 Scope of subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.13 Relationship to Subpart F of 10 CFR Part 2 and Appendix Q ofthis part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.15 Filing of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.17 Contents of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.18 Standards for review of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.19 Permit and renewal fees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.21 Hearings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.23 Referral to the ACRS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.24 Issuance of early site permit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.25 Extent of activities permitted.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.27 Duration of permit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.29 Application for renewal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.31 Criteria for renewal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.33 Duration of renewal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.35 Use of site for other purposes. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.37 Reporting of defects and noncompliance; revocation, suspension,modification of permits for cause.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.39 Finality of early site permit determinations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Standard Design Certifications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.41 Scope of subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.43 Relationship to Appendices M, N, and O of this part.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.45 Filing of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.47 Contents of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.48 Standards for review of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.49 Fees for review of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.51 Administrative review of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.53 Referral to the ACRS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.54 Issuance of Standard design certification. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.55 Duration of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.57 Application for renewal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.59 Criteria for renewal. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.61 Duration of renewal.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.63 Finality of standard design certifications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Combined Licenses </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.71 Scope of subpart.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.73 Relationship to Subparts A and B. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.75 Filing of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.77 Centents of applications; general information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.79 Contents of applications; technical information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.81 Standards for review of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.83 Applicability of Part 50 provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.85 Administrative review of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.87 Referral to the ACRS.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.89 Environmental review.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.91 Authorization to conduct site activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.93 Exemptions and variances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.97 Issuance of combined licenses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.99 Inspection during construction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.101 Pre-operational antitrust review.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">52.103 Operation under a combined license. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendices A-L [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix M_Standardization of Design; Manufacture of Nuclear PowerReactors; Construction and Operation of Nuclear Power Reactors ManufacturedPursuant to Commission License </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix N_Standardization of Nuclear Power Plant Designs: Licensesto Construct and Operate Nuclear Power Reactors of Duplicate Design atMultiple Sites</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix P_[Reserved] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix O_Standardization of Design: Staff Review of Standard Designs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Appendix Q_Pre-Application Early Review of Site Suitability Issues</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Secs. 103, 104, 161, 182, 183, 186, 189, 68 Stat. 936,948, 953, 954, 955, 956, as amended, sec. 234, 83 Stat. 1244, as amended(42 U.S.C. 2133, 2201, 2232, 2233, 2236, 2239, 2282); secs. 201, 202, 206,88 Stat. 1242, 1244, 1246, 1246, as amended (42 U.S.C. 5841, 5842, 5846).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG>This part governs the issuance of early site permits, standard design certifications,and combined licenses for nuclear power facilities licensed under section103 or 104b of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (68 Stat. 919),and Title II of the Energy Reorganization Act of 1974 (88 Stat. 1242).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this part,(a) ``Combined license'' means a combined construction permit and operatinglicense with conditions for a nuclear power facility issued pursuant toSubpart C of this part.(b) ``Early site permit'' means a Commission approval, issued pursuantto Subpart A of this part, for a site or sites for one or more nuclearpower facilities.(c) ``Standard design'' means a design which is sufficiently detailed andcomplete to support certification in accordance with Subpart B of thispart, and which is usable for a multiple number of units or at a multiplenumber of sites without reopening or repeating the review.(d) ``Standard design certification'', ``design certification'', or ``certification''means a Commission approval, issued pursuant to Subpart B of this part,of a standard design for a nuclear power facility. A design so approvedmay be referred to as a ``certified standard design''.(e) All other terms in this part have the meaning set out in 10 CFR 50.2,or section 11 of the Atomic Energy Act, as applicable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Interpretations.</ITAG>Except as specifically authorized by the Commission in writing, no interpretationof the meaning of the regulations in this part by any officer or employeeof the Commission other than a written interpretation by the General Counselwill be recognized to be binding upon the Commission.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Information collection requirements: OMB approval.</ITAG>(a) The Nuclear Regulatory Commission has submitted the information collectionrequirements contained in this part to the Office of Management and Budget(OMB) for approval as required by the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 (44U.S.C. 3501, <T3>et seq.</T3>). OMB has approved the information collection requirementscontained in this part under control number 3150(b).(b) The approved information collection requirements contained in thispart appear in andSection;andSection; 52.15, 52.17, 52.29, 52.45, 52.47, 52.57,52.75, 52.77, and 52.79.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_Early Site Permits</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of subpart.</ITAG>This subpart sets out the requirements and procedures applicable to Commissionissuance of early site permits for approval of a site or sites for oneor more nuclear power facilities separate from the filing of an applicationfor a construction permit or combined license for such a facility.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.13</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relationship to Subpart F of 10 CFR Part 2 and Appendix Q of thispart.</ITAG>The procedures of this subpart do not replace those set out in SubpartF of 10 CFR Part 2 or Appendix Q of this part. Subpart F applies only whenearly review of site suitability issues is sought in connection with anappliction for a permit to construct certain power facilities. AppendixQ applies only when NRC staff review of one or more site suitability issuesis sought separately from and prior to the submittal of a constructionpermit. A Staff Site Report issued under Appendix Q in no way affects theauthority of the Commission or the presiding officer in any proceedingunder Subpart F or G of 10 CFR Part 2. Subpart A applies when any personwho may apply for a construction permit under 10 CFR Part 50 or for a combinedlicense under 10 CFR Part 52 seeks an early site permit from the Commissionseparately from an application for a construction permit or a combinedlicense for a facility.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.15</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing of applications.</ITAG>(a) Any person who may apply for a construction permit under 10 CFR Part50, or for a combined license under 10 CFR Part 52, may file with the Directorof Nuclear Reactor Regulation an application for an early site permit.An application for an early site permit may be filed notwithstanding thefact that an application for a construction permit or a combined licensehas not been filed in connection with the site or sites for which a permitis sought.(b) The application must comply with the filing requirements of 10 CFR50.30 (a), (b), and (f) as they would apply to an application for a constructionpermit. The following portions of andSection; 50.4, which is referenced byandSection; 50.30(a)(1), are applicable: paragraphs (a), (b) (1)-(3), (c),(d), and (e).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.17</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contents of applications.</ITAG>(a)(1) The application must contain the information required by 10 CFR50.33 (a)-(d), the first three sentences of andSection; 50.34(a)(1), and,to the extent approval of emergency plans is sought under paragraph (b)(2)(ii)of this section, the information required by andSection; 50.33 (g) and (j),and andSection; 50.34(b)(6)(v). In particular, the application should describethe following:(i) The number, type, and thermal power level of the facilities for whichthe site may be used;(ii) The boundaries of the site;(iii) The proposed general location of each facility on the site;  (iv) The anticipated maximum levels of radiological and thermal effluentseach facility will produce;  (v) The type of cooling systems, intakes, and outflows that may be associatedwith each facility; (vi) The seismic, meteorological, hydrologic, and geologic characteristicsof the proposed site (see Appendix A to 10 CFR Part 100);  (vii) The location and description of any nearby industrial, military,or transportation facilities and routes; and  (viii) The existing and projected future population profile of the areasurrounding the site.  (2) A complete environmental report as required by 10 CFR 51.45 and 51.50must be included in the application, provided, however, that such environmentalreport must focus on the environmental effects of construction and operationof a reactor, or reactors, which have characteristics that fall withinthe postulated site parameters, and provided further that the report neednot include an assessment of the benefits (for example, need for power)of the proposed action, but must include an evaluation of alternative sitesto determine whether there is any obviously superior alternative to thesite proposed.  (b) (1) The application must identify physical characteristics unique tothe proposed site, such as egress limitations from the area surroundingthe site, that could pose a significant impediment to the development ofemergency plans.  (2) The application may also either: (i) Propose major features of the emergency plans, such as the exact sizesof the emergency planning zones, that can be reviewed and approved by NRCin consultation with FEMA in the absence of complete and integrated emergencyplans; or  (ii) Propose complete and integrated emergency plans for review and approvalby the NRC, in consultation with the Federal Emergency Management Agency,in accord with the applicable provisions of 10 CFR 50.47.  (3) Under paragraphs (b)(1) and (2)(i) of this section, the applicationmust include a description of contacts and arrangements made with local,state, and federal governmental agencies with emergency planning responsibilities.Under the option set forth in paragraph (b)(2)(ii) of this section, theapplicant shall make good faith efforts to obtain from the same governmentalagencies certifications that: (i) The proposed emergency plans are practicable;(ii) These agencies are committed to participating in any further developmentof the plans, including any required field demonstrations, and (iii) thatthese agencies are committed to executing their responsibilities underthe plans in the event of an emergency. The application must contain anycertifications that have been obtained. If these certifications cannotbe obtained, the application must contain information, including a utilityplan, sufficient to show that the proposed plans nonetheless provide reasonableassurance that adequate protective measures can and will be taken, in theevent of a radiological emergency at the site. (c) If the applicant wishes to be able to perform, after grant of the earlysite permit, the activities at the site allowed by 10 CFR 50.10(e)(1) withoutfirst obtaining the separate authorization required by that section, theapplicant shall propose, in the early site permit, a plan for redress ofthe site in the event that the activities are performed and the site permitexpires before it is referenced in an application for a construction permitor a combined license issued under Subpart C of this part. The applicationmust demonstrate that there is reasonable assurance that redress carriedout under the plan will achieve an environmentally stable and aestheticallyacceptable site suitable for whatever non-nuclear use may conform withlocal zoning laws.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;52.18  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standards for review of applications.  </ITAG>Applications filed under this subpart will be reviewed according to theapplicable standards set out in 10 CFR Part 50 and its appendices and Part100 as they apply to applications for construction permits for nuclearpower plants. In particular, the Commission shall prepare an environmentalimpact statement during review of the application, in accordance with theapplicable provisions of 10 CFR Part 51, provided, however, that the draftand final environmental impact statements prepared by the Commission focuson the environmental effects of construction and operation of a reactor,or reactors, which have characteristics that fall within the postulatedsite parameters, and provided further that the statements need not includean assessment of the benefits (for example, need for power) of the proposedaction, but must include an evaluation of alternative sites to determinewhether there is any obviously superior alternative to the site proposed.The Commission shall determine, after consultation with the Federal EmergencyManagement Agency, whether the information required of the applicant byandSection;52.17(b)(1) shows that there is no significant impediment to thedevelopment of emergency plans, whether any major features of emergencyplans submitted by the applicant under andSection;52.17(b)(2)(i) are acceptable,and whether any emergency plans submitted by the applicant under andSection;52.17(b)(2)(ii)provide reasonable assurance that adequate protective measures can andwill be taken in the event of a radiological emergency.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;52.19  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Permit and renewal fees.  </ITAG>The fees charged for the review of an application for the initial issuanceor renewal of an early site permit are set forth in 10 CFR 170.12, togetherwith a schedule for their deferred recovery. There is no application fee. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;52.21  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Hearings.  </ITAG>An early site permit is a partial construction permit and is thereforesubject to all procedural requirements in 10 CFR Part 2 which are applicableto construction permits, including the requirements for docketing in andSection;andSection;2.101(a)(1)-(4),and the requirements for issuance of a notice of hearing in andSection;andSection;2.104(a),(b)(1)(iv) and (v), (b)(2) to the extent it runs parallel to (b)(1)(iv)and (v), and (b)(3), provided that the designated sections may not be construedto require that the environmental report or draft or final environmentalimpact statement include an assessment of the benefits of the proposedaction. In the hearing, the presiding officer shall also determine whether,taking into consideration the site criteria contained in 10 CFR Part 100,a reactor, or reactors, having characteristics that fall within the parametersfor the site can be constructed and operated without undue risk to thehealth and safety of the public. All hearings conducted on applicationsfor early site permits filed under this part are governed by the procedurescontained in Subpart G of Part 2.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;52.23  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Referral to the ACRS.  </ITAG>The Commission shall refer a copy of the application to the Advisory Committeeon Reactor Safeguards (ACRS). The ACRS shall report on those portions ofthe application which concern safety.  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;52.24  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of early site permit.  </ITAG>After conducting a hearing under andSection;52.21 of this subpart and receivingthe report to be submitted by the Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguardsunder andSection;52.23 of this subpart, and upon determining that an applicationfor an early site permit meets the applicable standards and requirementsof the Atomic Energy Act and the Commission's regulations, and that notifications,if any, to other agencies or bodies have been duly made, the Commissionshall issue an early site permit, in the form and containing the conditionsand limitations, as the Commission deems appropriate and necessary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Extent of activities permitted.</ITAG>(a) If an early site permit contains a site redress plan, the holder ofthe permit, or the applicant for a construction permit or combined licensewho references the permit, may perform the activities at the site allowedby 10 CFR 50.10(e)(1) without first obtaining the separate authorizationrequired by that section, provided that the final environmental impactstatement prepared for the permit has concluded that the activities willnot result in any significant adverse environmental impact which cannotbe redressed.(b) If the activities permitted by paragraph (a) of this section are performedat any site for which an early site permit has been granted, and the siteis not referenced in an application for a construction permit or a combinedlicense issued under Subpart C of this part while the permit remains valid,then the early site permit must remain in effect solely for the purposeof site redress, and the holder of the permit shall redress the site inaccordance with the terms of the site redress plan required by andSection;52.17(c). If, before redress is complete, a use not envisaged in the redressplan is found for the site or parts thereof, the holder of the permit shallcarry out the redress plan to the greatest extent possible consistent withthe alternate use.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.27</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of permit.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, an early sitepermit issued under this subpart may be valid for not less than ten normore than twenty years from the date of issuance.(b) (1) An early site permit continues to be valid beyond the date of expirationin any proceeding on a construction permit application or a combined licenseapplication which references the early site permit and is docketed eitherbefore the date of expiration of the early site permit, or, if a timelyapplication for renewal of the permit has been filed, before the Commissionhas determined whether to renew the permit.(2) An early site permit also continues to be valid beyond the date ofexpiration in any proceeding on an operating license application whichis based on a construction permit which references the early site permit,and in any hearing held under andSection; 52.103 of this part before operationbegins under a combined license which references the early site permit.(c) An applicant for a construction permit or combined license may, atits own risk, reference in its application a site for which an early sitepermit application has been docketed but not granted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.29</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Application for renewal.</ITAG>(a) Not less than twelve nor more than thirty-six months prior to the endof the initial twenty-year period, or any later renewal period, the permitholder may apply for a renewal of the permit. An application for renewalmust contain all information necessary to bring up to date the informationand data contained in the previous application.(b) Any person whose interests may be affected by renewal of the permitmay request a hearing on the application for renewal. The request for ahearing must comply with 10 CFR 2.714. If a hearing is granted, noticeof the hearing will be published in accordance with 10 CFR 2.703.(c) An early site permit, either original or renewed, for which a timelyapplication for renewal has been filed, remains in effect until the Commissionhas determined whether to renew the permit. If the permit is not renewed,it continues to be valid in certain proceedings in accordance with theprovisions of andSection; 52.27(b).(d) The Commission shall refer a copy of the application for renewal tothe Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguards (ACRS). The ACRS shall reporton those portions of the application which concern safety and shall applythe criteria set forth in andSection; 52.31. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.31</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Criteria for renewal.</ITAG>(a) The Commission shall grant the renewal if the Commission determinesthat the site complies with the Atomic Energy Act and the Commission'sregulations and orders applicable and in effect at the time the site permitwas originally issued, and any new requirements the Commission may wishto impose after a determination that there is a substantial increase inoverall protection of the public health and safety or the common defenseand security to be derived from the new requirements and that the directand indirect costs of implementation of those requirements are justifiedin view of this increased protection.(b) A denial of renewal on this basis does not bar the permit holder oranother applicant from filing a new application for the site which proposeschanges to the site or the way in which it is used which correct the deficienciescited in the denial of the renewal.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.33</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Duration of renewal.</ITAG>Each renewal of an early site permit may be for not less than ten nor morethan twenty years.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.35</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of site for other purposes.</ITAG>A site for which an early site permit has been issued under this subpartmay be used for purposes other than those described in the permit, includingthe location of other types of energy facilities. The permit holder shallinform the Director of Nuclear Reactor Regulation of any significant usesfor the site which have not been approved in the early site permit. Theinformation about the activities must be given to the Director in advanceof any actual construction or site modification for the activities. Theinformation provided could be the basis for imposing new requirements onthe permit, in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 52.39. If thepermit holder informs the Director that the holder no longer intends touse the site for a nuclear power plant, the Director shall terminate thepermit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.37</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reporting of defects and noncompliance; revocation, suspension, modificationof permits for cause.</ITAG>For purposes of Part 21 and 10 CFR 50.100, an early site permit is a constructionpermit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.39</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Finality of early site permit determinations.</ITAG>(a)(1) Notwithstanding any provision in 10 CFR 50.109, while an early sitepermit is in effect under andSection;andSection; 52.27 or 52.33 the Commissionmay not impose new requirements, including new emergency planning requirements,on the early site permit or the site for which it was issued, unless theCommission determines that a modification is necessary either to bringthe permit or the site into compliance with the Commission's regulationsand orders applicable and in effect at the time the permit was issued,or to assure adequate protection of the public health and safety or thecommon defense and security.(2) In making the findings required for issuance of a construction permit,operating license, or combined license, or the findings required by andSection;52.103 of this part, if the application for the construction permit, operatinglicense, or combined license references an early site permit, the Commissionshall treat as resolved those matters resolved in the proceeding on theapplication for issuance or renewal of the early site permit, unless acontention is admitted that a reactor does not fit within one or more ofthe site parameters included in the site permit, or a petition is filedwhich alleges either that the site is not in compliance with the termsof the early site permit, or that the terms and conditions of the earlysite permit should be modified.(i) A contention that a reactor does not fit within one or more of thesite parameters included in the site permit may be litigated in the samemanner as other issues material to the proceeding.(ii) A petition which alleges that the site is not in compliance with theterms of the early site permit must include, or clearly reference, officialNRC documents, documents prepared by or for the permit holder, or evidenceadmissible in a proceeding under Subpart G of Part 2, which show, primafacie, that the acceptance criteria have not been met. The permit holderand NRC staff may file answers to the petition within the time specifiedin 10 CFR 2.730 for answers to motions by parties and staff. If the Commission,in its judgment, decides, on the basis of the petitions and any answersthereto, that the petition meets the requirements of this paragraph, thatthe issues are not exempt from adjudication under 5 U.S.C. 554(a)(3), thatgenuine issues of material fact are raised, and that settlement or otherinformal resolution of the issues is not possible, then the genuine issuesof material fact raised by the petition must be resolved in accordancewith the provisions in 554, 556, and 557 which are applicable to determiningapplication for initial licenses.(iii) A petition which alleges that the terms and conditions of the earlysite permit should be modified will be processed in accord with 10 CFR2.206. Before construction commences, the Commission shall consider thepetition and determine whether any immediate action is required. If thepetition is granted, then an appropriate order will be issued. Constructionunder the construction permit or combined license will not be affectedby the granting of the petition unless the order is made immediately effective.(iv) Prior to construction, the Commission shall find that the terms ofthe early site permit have been met.(b) An applicant for a construction permit, operating license, or combinedlicense who has filed an application referencing an early site permit issuedunder this subpart may include in the application a request for a variancefrom one or more elements of the permit. In determining whether to grantthe variance, the Commission shall apply the same technically relevantcriteria as were applicable to the application for the original or renewedsite permit. Issuance of the variance must be subject to litigation duringthe construction permit, operating license, or combined license proceedingin the same manner as other issues material to those proceedings.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart B_Standard Design Certifications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.41</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of subpart. </ITAG>This subpart set out the requirements and procedures applicable to Commissionissuance of rules granting standard design certification for nuclear powerfacilities separate from the filing of an application for a constructionpermit or combined license for such facility.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.43</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relationship to Appendices M, N, and O of this part. </ITAG>(a) Appendix M to this part governs the issuance of licenses to manufacturenuclear power reactors to be installed and operated at sites not identifiedin the manufacturing license application. Appendix N governs licenses toconstruct and operate nuclear power reactors of duplicate design at multiplesites. These appendices may be used independently of the provisions inthis subpart unless the applicant also wishes to use a certified standarddesign approved under this subpart. (b) Appendix O governs the staff review and approval of preliminary andfinal standard designs. A staff approval under Appendix O is no way affectsthe authority of the Commission or the presiding officer in any proceedingunder Subpart G of 10 CFR Part 2. Subpart B of Part 52 governs Commissionapproval, or certification, of standard designs by rulemaking. (c) A final design approval under Appendix O is a prerequisite for certificationof a standard design under this subpart. An application for a final designapproval must state whether the applicant intends to seek certificationof the design. If the applicant does so intend, the application for thefinal design approval must, in addition to containing the information requiredby Appendix O, comply with the applicable requirements of Part 52, SubpartB, particularly andSection;andSection; 52.45 and 52.47.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing of applications. </ITAG>(a)(1) Any person may seek a standard design certification for an essentiallycomplete nuclear power plant design which is an evolutionary change fromlight water reactor designs of plants which have been licensed and in commercialoperation before the effective date of this rule.(2) Any person may also seek a standard design certification for a nuclearpower plant design which differs significantly from the light water reactordesigns described in paragraph (a)(1) of this section or utilizes simplified,inherent, passive, or other innovative means to accomplish its safety functions.(b) An application for certification may be filed notwithstanding the factthat an application for a construction permit or combined license for sucha facility has not been filed.(c)(1) Because a final design approval under Appendix O of this part isa prerequisite for certification of a standard design, a person who seekssuch a certification and does not hold, or has not applied for, a finaldesign approval, shall file with the Director of Nuclear Reactor Regulationan application for a final design approval and certification.(2) Any person who seeks certification but already holds, or has appliedfor, a final design approval, also shall file with the Director of NuclearReactor Regulation an application for certification, because the NRC staffmay require that the information before the staff in connection with thereview for the final design approval be supplemented for the review forcertification.(d) The applicant must comply with the filing requirements of 10 CFR 50.30(a)(1)-(4), and (6) and 50.30(b) as they would apply to an application fora nuclear power plant construction permit. The following portions of andSection;50.4, which is referenced by andSection; 50.30(a)(1), are applicable to theextent technically relevant: paragraphs (a); (b), except for paragraphs(6); (c); and (e).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.47</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contents of applications.</ITAG>(a) The requirements of this paragraph apply to all applications for designcertification.(1) An application for design certification must contain:(i) The technical information which is required of applicants for constructionpermits and operating licenses by 10 CFR Part 20, Part 50 and its appendices,and Parts 73 and 100, and which is technically relevant to the design andnot site-specific;(ii) Demonstration of compliance with any technically relevant portionsof the Three Mile Island requirements set forth in 10 CFR 50.34(f);(iii) The site parameters postulated for the design, and an analysis andevaluation of the design in terms of such parameters;(iv) Proposed technical resolutions of those Unresolved Safety Issues andmedium- and high-priority Generic Safety Issues which are identified inthe version of NUREG-0933 current on the date six months prior to applicationand which are technically relevant to the design;(v) A design-specific probabilistic risk assessment;(vi) Proposed tests, inspections, analyses, and acceptance criteria whichare necessary and sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that, if thetests, inspections and analyses are performed and the acceptance criteriamet, a plant which references the design is built and will operate in accordancewith the design certification.(vii) The interface requirements to be met by those portions of the plantfor which the application does not seek certification. These requirementsmust be sufficiently detailed to allow completion of the final safety analysisand design-specific probabilistic risk assessment required by paragraph(a)(1)(v) of this section;(viii) Justification that compliance with the interface requirements ofparagraph (a)(1)(vii) of this section is verifiable through inspection,testing (either in the plant or elsewhere), or analysis. The method tobe used for verification of interface requirements must be included aspart of the proposed tests, inspections, analyses, and acceptance criteriarequired by paragraph (a)(1)(vi) of this section; and(ix) A representative conceptual design for those portions of the plantfor which the application does not seek certification, to aid the staffin its review of the final safety analysis and probabilistic risk assessmentrequired by paragraph (a)(1)(v) of this section, and to permit assessmentof the adequacy of the interface requirements called for by paragraph (a)(1)(vii)of this subsection.(2) The application must contain a level of design information sufficientto enable the Commission to judge the applicant's proposed means of assuringthat construction conforms to the design and to reach a final conclusionon all safety questions associated with the design before the certificationis granted. The information submitted for a design certification must includeperformance requirements and design information sufficiently detailed topermit the preparation of acceptance and inspection requirements by theNRC, and procurement specifications and construction and installation specificationsby an applicant. The Commission will require, prior to design certification,that information normally contained in certain procurement specificationsand construction and installation specifications be completed and availablefor audit if such information is necessary for the Commission to make itssafety determination.(3) The staff shall advise the applicant on whether any technical informationbeyond that required by this section must be submitted.(b) This paragraph applies, according to its provisions, to particularapplications:(1) The application for certification of a nuclear power plant design whichis an evolutionary change from light water reactor designs of plants whichhave been licensed and in commercial operation before the effective dateof this rule must provide an essentially complete nuclear power plant designexcept for site-specific elements such as the service water intake structureand the ultimate heat sink.(2)(i) Certification of a standard design which differs significantly fromthe light water reactor designs described in paragraph (b)(1) of this sectionor utilizes simplified, inherent, passive, or other innovative means toaccomplish its safety functions will be granted only if(A) (<T3>1</T3>) The performance of each safety feature of the design has beendemonstrated through either analysis, appropriate test programs, experience,or a combination thereof;(<T3>2</T3>) Interdependent effects among the safety features of the designhave been found acceptable by analysis, appropriate test programs, experience,or a combination thereof;(<T3>3</T3>) Sufficient data exist on the safety features of the designto assess the analytical tools used for safety analyses over a sufficientrange of normal operating conditions, transient conditions, and specifiedaccident sequences, including equilibrium core conditions; and(<T3>4</T3>) The scope of the design is complete except for site-specificelements such as the service water intake structure and the ultimate heatsink; or(B) There has been acceptable testing of an appropriately sited, full-size,prototype of the design over a sufficient range of normal operating conditions,transient conditions, and specified accident sequences, including equilibriumcore conditions. If the criterion in paragraph (b)(2)(i)(A)(<T3>4</T3>) of this section is not met, the testing of the prototype mustdemonstrate that the non-certified portion of the plant cannot significantlyaffect the safe operation of the plant.(ii) The application for final design approval of a standard design ofthe type described in this subsection must propose the specific testingnecessary to support certification of the design, whether the testing beprototype testing or the testing required in the alternative by paragraph(b)(2)(i)(A) of this section.The Appendix O final design approval of such a design must identify thespecific testing required for certification of the design.(3) An application seeking certification of a modular design must describethe various options for the configuration of the plant and site, includingvariations in, or sharing of, common systems, interface requirements, andsystem interactions. The final safety analysis and the probabilistic riskassessment should also account for differences among the various options,including any restrictions which will be necessary during the constructionand startup of a given module to ensure the safe operation of any modulealready operating.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.48 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standards for review of applications.</ITAG>Applications filed under this subpart will be reviewed for compliance withthe standards set out in 10 CFR Part 20, Part 50 and its appendices, andParts 73 and 100 as they apply to applications for construction permitsand operating licenses for nuclear power plants, and as those standardsare technically relevant to the design proposed for the facility.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.49 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fees for review of applications.</ITAG>The fees charged for the review of an application for the initial issuanceor renewal of a standard design certification are set out in 10 CFR 170.12,together with a schedule for their deferred recovery. There is no applicationfee.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.51</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Administrative review of applications.</ITAG>(a) A standard design certification is a rule that will be issued in accordancewith the provisions of Subpart H of 10 CFR Part 2, as supplemented by theprovisions of this section. The Commission shall initiate the rulemakingafter an application has been filed under andSection; 52.45 and shall specifythe procedures to be used for the rulemaking.(b) The rulemaking procedures must provide for notice and comment and anopportunity for an informal hearing before an Atomic Safety and LicensingBoard. The procedures for the informal hearing must include the opportunityfor written presentations made under oath or affirmation and for oral presentationsand questioning if the Board finds them either necessary for the creationof an adequate record or the most expeditious way to resolve controversies.Ordinarily, the questioning in the informal hearing will be done by membersof the Board, using either the Board's questions or questions submittedto the Board by the parties. The Board may also request authority fromthe Commission to use additional procedures, such as direct and cross examinationby the parties, or may request that the Commission convene a formal hearingunder Subpart G of 10 CFR Part 2 on specific and substantial disputes offact, necessary for the Commission's decision, that cannot be resolvedwith sufficient accuracy except in a formal hearing. The staff will bea party in the hearing.(c) The decision in such a hearing will be based only on information onwhich all parties have had an opportunity to comment, either in responseto the notice of proposed rulemaking or in the informal hearing. Notwithstandinganything in 10 CFR 2.790 to the contrary, proprietary information willbe protected in the same manner and to the same extent as proprietary informationsubmitted in connection with applications for construction permits andoperating licenses under 10 CFR Part 50, provided that the design certificationshall be published in Chapter I of this Title.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.53</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Referral to the ACRS.</ITAG>The Commission shall refer a copy of the application to the Advisory Committeeon Reactor Safeguards (ACRS). The ACRS shall report on those portions ofthe application which concern safety.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.54</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Issuance of standard design certification.</ITAG>After conducting a rulemaking proceeding under andSection; 52.51 on an applicationfor a standard design certification and receiving the report to be submittedby the Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguards under andSection; 52.53,and upon determining that the application meets the applicable standardsand requirements of the Atomic Energy Act and the Commission's regulations,the Commission shall issue a standard design certification in the formof a rule for the design which is the subject of the application.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Duration of certification.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, a standard designcertification issued pursuant to this subpart is valid for fifteen yearsfrom the date of issuance.(b) A standard design certification continues to be valid beyond the dateof expiration in any proceeding on an application for a combined licenseor operating license which references the standard design certificationand is docketed either before the date of expiration of the certification,or, if a timely application for renewal of the certification has been filed,before the Commission has determined whether to renew the certification.A design certification also continues to be valid beyond the date of expirationin any hearing held under andSection; 52.103 before operation begins undera combined license which references the design certification.(c) An applicant for a construction permit or combined license may, atits own risk, reference in its application a design for which a designcertification application has been docketed but not granted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.57</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Application for renewal.</ITAG>(a) Not less than twelve nor more than thirty-six months prior to expirationof the initial fifteen-year period, or any later renewal period, any personmay apply for renewal of the certification. An application for renewalmust contain all information necessary to bring up to date the informationand data contained in the previous application. The Commission will require,prior to renewal of certification, that information normally containedin certain procurement specifications and construction and installationspecifications be completed and available for audit if such informationis necessary for the Commission to make its safety determination. Noticeand comment procedures must be used for a rulemaking proceeding on theapplication for renewal. The Commission, in its discretion, may requirethe use of additional procedures in individual renewal proceedings.(b) A design certification, either original or renewed, for which a timelyapplication for renewal has been filed remains in effect until the Commissionhas determined whether to renew the certification. If the certificationis not renewed, it continues to be valid in certain proceedings, in accordancewith the provisions of andSection; 52.55.(c) The Commission shall refer a copy of the application for renewal tothe Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguards (ACRS). The ACRS shall reporton those portions of the application which concern safety and shall applythe criteria set forth in andSection; 52.59.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.59</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for renewal.</ITAG>(a) The Commission shall issue a rule granting the renewal if the design,either as originally certified or as modified during the rulemaking onthe renewal, complies with the Atomic Energy Act and the Commission's regulationsapplicable and in effect at the time the certification was issued, andany other requirements the Commission may wish to impose after a determinationthat there is a substantial increase in overall protection of the publichealth and safety or the common defense and security to be derived fromthe new requirements and that the direct and indirect costs of implementationof those requirements are justified in view of this increased protection.In addition, the applicant for renewal may request an amendment to thedesign certification. The Commission shall grant the amendment requestif it determines that the amendment will comply with the Atomic EnergyAct and the Commission's regulations in effect at the time or renewal.If the amendment request entails such an extensive change to the designcertification that an essentially new standard design is being proposed,an application for a design certification shall be filed in accordancewith andSection; 52.45 and 52.47 of this part.(b) Denial of renewal does not bar the applicant, or another applicant,from filing a new application for certification of the design, which proposesdesign changes which correct the deficiencies cited in the denial of therenewal.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.61</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of renewal.</ITAG>Each renewal of certification for a standard design will be for not lessthan ten nor more than fifteen years.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.68</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Finality of standard design certifications.</ITAG>(a)(1) Notwithstanding any provision in 10 CFR 50.109, while a standarddesign certification is in effect under andSection; 52.55 or 52.61, the Commissionmay not modify, rescind, or impose new requirements on the certification,whether on its own motion, or in response to a petition from any person,unless the Commission determines in a rulemaking that a modification isnecessary either to bring the certification or the referencing plants intocompliance with the Commission's regulations applicable and in effect atthe time the certification was issued, or to assure adequate protectionof the public health and safety or the common defense and security. Therulemaking procedures must provide for notice and comment and an opportunityfor the party which applied for the certification to request an informalhearing which uses the procedures described in andSection; 52.51 of thissubpart.(2) Any modification the NRC imposes on a design certification rule underparagraph (a)(1) of this section will be applied to all plants referencingthe certified design, except those to which the modification has been renderedtechnically irrelevant by action taken under paragraphs (a)(3), (a)(4),or (b) of this section.(3) While a design certification is in effect under andSection; 52.55 orandSection; 52.61, unless (i) a modification is necessary to secure compliancewith the Commission's regulations applicable and in effect at the timethe certification was issued, or to assure adequate protection of the publichealth and safety or the common defense and security, and (ii) specialcircumstances as defined in 10 CFR 50.12(a) are present, the Commissionmay not impose new requirements by plant-specific order on any part ofthe design of a specific plant referencing the design certification ifthat part was approved in the design certification. In addition to thefactors listed in andSection; 50.12(a), the Commission shall consider whetherthe special circumstances which andSection; 50.12(a)(2) requires to be presentoutweigh any decrease in safety that may result from the reduction in standardizationcaused by the plant-specific order.(4) Except as provided in 10 CFR 2.758, in making the findings requiredfor issuance of a combined license or operating license, or for any hearingunder andSection; 52.103, the Commission shall treat as resolved those mattersresolved in connection with the issuance or renewal of a design certification.(b)(1) An applicant or licensee who references a standard design certificationmay request an exemption from one or more elements of the design certification.The Commission may grant such a request only if it determines that theexemption will comply with the requirements of 10 CFR 50.12(a). In additionto the factors listed in andSection; 50.12(a), the Commission shall considerwhether the special circumstances which andSection; 50.12(a)(2) requiresto be present outweigh any decrease in safety that may result from thereduction in standardization caused by the exemption. The granting of anexemption on request of an applicant must be subject to litigation in thesame manner as other issues in the operating license or combined licensehearing.(2) Subject andSection; 50.59, a licensee who references a standard designcertification may make changes to the design of the nuclear power facility,without prior Commission approval, unless the proposed change involvesa change to the design as described in the rule certifying the design.The licensee shall maintain records of all changes to the facility andthese records must be maintained and available for audit until the dateof termination of the license.(c) The Commission will require, prior to granting a construction permit,combined license, or operating license which references a standard designcertification, that information normally contained in certain procurementspecifications and construction and installation specifications be completedand available for audit if such information is necessary for the Commissionto make its safety determinations, including the determination that theapplication is consistent with the certified design. This information maybe acquired by appropriate arrangements with the design certification applicant.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Combined Licenses </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.71</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope of Subpart. </ITAG>This subpart sets out the requirements and procedures applicable to Commissionissuance of combined licenses for nuclear power facilities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.73</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relationship to Subparts A and B. </ITAG>An application for a combined license under this subpart may, but neednot, reference a standard design certification issued under Subpart B ofthis part or an early site permit issued under Subpart A of this part,or both. In the absence of a demonstration that an entity other than theone originally sponsoring and obtaining a design certification is qualifiedto supply such design, the Commission will entertain an application fora combined license which references a standard design certification issuedunder Subpart B only if the entity that sponsored and obtained the certificationsupplies the certified design for the applicant's use. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.75</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing of applications. </ITAG>Any person except one excluded by 10 CFR 50.38 may file an applicationfor a combined license for a nuclear power facility with the Director ofNuclear Reactor Regulation. The applicant shall comply with the filingrequirements of 10 CFR 50.4 and 50.30 (a) and (b), except for paragraph(b)(6) of andSection; 50.4, as they would apply to an application for a nuclearpower plant construction permit. The fees associated with the filing andreview of the application are set out in 10 CFR Part 170. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.77</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contents of applications; general information. </ITAG>The application must contain all of the information required by 10 CFR50.33, as that section would apply to applicants for construction permitsand operating licenses, and 10 CFR 50.33a, as that section would applyto an applicant for a nuclear power plant construction permit. In particular,the applicant shall comply with the requirement of andSection; 50.33a(b)regarding the submission of antitrust information. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.79</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contents of applications; technical information.</ITAG>(a)(1) In general, if the application references an early site permit,the application need not contain information or analyses submitted to theCommission in connection with the early site permit, but must contain,in addition to the information and analyses otherwise required, informationsufficient to demonstrate that the design of the facility falls withinthe parameters specified in the early site permit, and to resolve any othersignificant environmental issue not considered in any previous proceedingon the site or the design. (2) If the application does not reference an early site permit, the applicantshall comply with the requirements of 10 CFR 50.30(f) by including withthe application an environmental report prepared in accordance with theprovisions of Subpart A of 10 CFR Part 51. (3) If the application does not reference an early site permit which containsa site redress plan as described in andSection; 52.17(c), and if the applicantwishes to be able to perform the activities at the site allowed by 10 CFR50.10(e)(1), then the application must contain the information requiredby andSection; 52.17(c). (b) The application must contain the technically relevant information requiredof applicants for an operating license by 10 CFR 50.34. The final safetyanalysis report and other required information may incorporate by referencethe final safety analysis report for a certified standard design. In particular,an application referencing a certified design must describe those portionsof the design which are site-specific, such as the service water intakestructure and the ultimate heat sink. An application referencing a certifieddesign must also demonstrate compliance with the interface requirementsestablished for the design under andSection; 52.47(a)(1), and have availablefor audit procurement specifications and construction and installationspecifications in accordance with andSection; 52.47(a)(2). If the applicationdoes not reference a certified design, the application must comply withthe requirements of andSection; 52.47(a)(2) for level of design information,and shall contain the technical information required by andSection;andSection;52.47(a)(1) (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) and (3), and, if the design is modular,andSection; 52.47(b)(3). (c) The application for a combined license must include the proposed test,inspections, and analyses which the licensee shall perform and the acceptancecriteria therefor which are necessary and sufficient to provide reasonableassurance that, if the tests, inspections and analyses are performed andthe acceptance criteria met, the facility has been constructed and willoperate in conformity with the combined license. Where the applicationreferences a certified standard design, the test, inspections, analysesand acceptance criteria contained in the certified design must apply tothose portions of the facility design which are covered by the design certification.(d) The application must contain emergency plans which provide reasonableassurance that adequate protective measures can and will be taken in theevent of a radiological emergency at the site. (1) If the application references an early site permit, the applicationmay incorporate by reference emergency plans, or major features of emergencyplans, approved in connection with the issuance of the permit. (2) If the application does not reference an early site permit, or if noemergency plans were approved in connection with the issuance of the permit,the applicant shall make good faith efforts to obtain certifications fromthe local and State governmental agencies with emergency planning responsibilities(i) that the proposed emergency plans are practicable, (ii) that theseagencies are committed to participating in any further development of theplans, including any required field demonstrations, and (iii) that theseagencies are committed to executing their responsibilities under the plansin the event of an emergency. The application must contain any certificationsthat have been obtained. If these certifications cannot be obtained, theapplication must contain information, including a utility plan, sufficientto show that the proposed plans nonetheless provide reasonable assurancethat adequate protective measures can and will be taken in the event ofa radiological emergency at the site. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.81</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standards for review of applications. </ITAG>Applications filed under this subpart will be reviewed according to thestandards set out in 10 CFR Parts 20, 50, 51, 55, 73, and 100 as they applyto applications for construction permits and operating licenses for nuclearpower plants, and as those standards are technically relevant to the designproposed for the facility. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.83</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability of Part 50 provisions. </ITAG>Unless otherwise specifically provided in this subpart, all provisionsof 10 CFR Part 50 and its appendices applicable to holders of constructionpermits for nuclear power reactors also apply to holders of combined licensesissued under this subpart. Similarly, all provisions of 10 CFR Part 50and its appendices applicable to holders of operating licenses also applyto holders of combined licenses issued under this subpart, once the Commissionhas made the findings required under andSection; 52.103, provided that, asapplied to a combined license, 10 CFR 50.51 must require that the initialduration of the license may not exceed 40 years from the date on whichthe Commission makes the findings required under andSection; 52.103. However,any limitations contained in Part 50 regarding applicability of the provisionsto certain classes of facilities continue to apply. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.85</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Administrative review of applications.</ITAG>A proceeding on a combined license is subject to all applicable proceduralrequirements contained in 10 CFR Part 2, including the requirements fordocketing (andSection; 2.101) and issuance of a notice of hearing (andSection;2.104). All hearings on combined licenses are governed by the procedurescontained in Part 2, Subpart G.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.87</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Referral to the ACRS.</ITAG>The Commission shall refer a copy of the application to the Advisory Committeeon Reactor Safeguards (ACRS). The ACRS shall report on those portions ofthe application which concern safety and shall apply the criteria set forthin andSection; 52.81, in accordance with the finality provisions of thispart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.89</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Environmental review.</ITAG>If the application references an early site permit or a certified standarddesign, the environmental review must focus on whether the design of thefacility falls within the parameters specified in the early site permitand any other significant environmental issue not considered in any previousproceeding on the site or the design. If the application does not referencean early site permit or a certified standard design, the environmentalreview procedures set out in 10 CFR Part 51 must be followed, includingthe issuance of a final environmental impact statement, but excluding theissuance of a supplement under andSection; 51.95(a).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.91</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Authorization to conduct site activities.</ITAG>(a)(1) If the application references an early site permit which containsa site redress plan as described in andSection; 52.17(c) the applicant isauthorized by andSection; 52.25 to perform the site preparation activitiesdescribed in 10 CFR 50.10(e)(1).(2) If the application does not reference an early site permit which containsa redress plan, the applicant may not perform the site preparation activitiesallowed by 10 CFR 50.10(e)(1) without first submitting a site redress planin accord with andSection; 52.79(a)(3) and obtaining the separate authorizationrequired by 10 CFR 50.10(e)(1). Authorization must be granted only afterthe presiding officer in the proceeding on the application has made thefindings and determination required by 10 CFR 50.10(e)(2) and has determinedthat the site redress plan meets the criteria in andSection; 52.17(c).(3) Authorization to conduct the activities described in 10 CFR 50.10(e)(3)(i)may be granted only after the presiding officer in the combined licenseproceeding makes the additional finding required by 10 CFR 50.10(e)(3)(ii).(b) If, after an applicant for a combined license has performed the activitiespermitted by paragraph (a) of this section, the application for the licenseis withdrawn or denied, and the early site permit referenced by the applicationexpires, then the applicant shall redress the site in accord with the termsof the site redress plan. If, before redress is complete, a use not envisagedin the redress plan is found for the site or parts thereof, the applicantshall carry out the redress plan to the greatest extent possible consistentwith the alternate use.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.93</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exemptions and variances.</ITAG>(a) Applicants for a combined license under this subpart, or any amendmentto a combined license, may include in the application a request, under10 CFR 50.12, for an exemption from one or more of the Commission's regulations,including any part of a design certification rule. The Commission shallgrant such a request if it determines that the exemption will comply withthe requirements of 10 CFR 50.12(a) or 52.63(b)(1) if the exemption includesany part of the design certification rule.(b) An applicant for a combined license, or any amendment to a combinedlicense, who has filed an application referencing an early site permitissued under this subpart may include in the application a request fora variance from one or more elements of the permit. In determining whetherto grant the variance, the Commission shall apply the same technicallyrelevant criteria as were applicable to the application for the originalor renewed site permit. Issuance of the variance must be subject to litigationduring the combined license proceeding in the same manner as other issuesmaterial to that proceeding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.97</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Issuance of combined licenses.</ITAG>(a) The Commission shall issue a combined license for a nuclear power facilityupon finding that the applicable requirements of 10 CFR 50.40, 50.42, 50.43,50.47, and 50.50 have been met, and that there is reasonable assurancethat the facility will be constructed and operated in conformity with thelicense, the provisions of the Atomic Energy Act, and the Commission'sregulations.(b) The Commission shall identify in the license the tests, inspections,and analyses that the licensee shall perform and the acceptance criteriatherefor which are necessary and sufficient to provide reasonable assurancethat, if the tests, inspections, and analyses are performed and the acceptancecriteria met, the facility has been constructed and will be operated inconformity with the license, the provisions of the Atomic Energy Act, andthe Commission's regulations. Any modification to, addition to, or deletionfrom the terms of a combined license, including any modification to, additionto, or deletion from the tests, inspections, analyses, or related acceptancecriteria contained in such license, is a proposed amendment to such license.There shall be an opportunity for a hearing on the proposed amendments,and any hearing held must be completed before operation of the facility.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.99 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Inspection during construction.</ITAG>After issuance of a combined license, the NRC staff shall assure that therequired inspections, tests, and analyses are performed and that the prescribedacceptance criteria are met. Holders of combined licenses shall complywith the provisions of 10 CFR 50.70 and 50.71. At appropriate intervalsduring construction, the NRC staff shall publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> notices of the successful completion of inspections,tests, and analyses.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Pre-operational antitrust review.</ITAG>If, before the Commission makes the findings required uner andSection; 52.103,the Commission, after consultation with the Attorney General, determinesthat significant changes in the licensee's activities or proposed activitieshave occurred subsequent to the previous review by the Attorney Generaland the Commission in connection with the issuance of the combined license,the antitrust review required by section 105c(2) of the Atomic Energy Actmust be completed prior to commencement of commercial operation of thefacility. Upon completion of this review, the Director of Nuclear ReactorRegulation may impose any additional license conditions as authorized bysection 105c of the Atomic Energy Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 52.103</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operation under a combined license.</ITAG>(a) Not less than 180 days before loading of fuel into the reactor, theholder of the combined license shall, in writing, notify the Commissionof the expected dates of both fuel loading and criticality. The Commissionshall publish notice of these dates in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice must also advise persons whose interestsmay be affected by facility operation of their rights under paragraph (b)of this section.(b)(1) Not later than 60 days after publication of the notice requiredby paragraph (a) of this section, any person whose interest may be affectedby facility operation may file one or both of the following in writing:(i) A petition which shows, prima facie, that one or more of the acceptancecriteria in the combined license have not been met and, as a result, thereis good cause to modify or prohibit operation; or (ii) A petition to modify the terms and conditions of the combined license.(2)(i) A good cause petition filed under paragraph (b)(1)(i) of this sectionwill be granted by the Commission only if it includes, or clearly references,official NRC documents, documents prepared by or for the combined licenseholder, or evidence admissible in a proceeding under Subpart G of Part2, which show, prima facie, that the acceptance criteria have not beenmet. The combined license holder and NRC staff may file answers to thepetition within the time specified in 10 CFR 2.730 for answers to motionsby parties and staff. If the Commission in its judgment decides, on thebasis of the petitions and any answers thereto, that the petition meetsthe requirements of this paragraph, that the issues raised by the petitionare not exempt from adjudication under 5 U.S.C. 554(a)(3), that genuineissues of material fact are raised, and that settlement or other informalresolution of the issues is not possible, then the genuine issues of materialfact raised by the petition must be resolved in accordance with the provisionsin 5 U.S.C. 554, 556, and 557 which are applicable to determining applicationsfor initial licenses. In such cases, the notice of hearing from the Commissionmust specify the procedures to be followed. Matters exempt from adjudicationunder 5 U.S.C. 554(a)(3) may be decided by the Commission solely on thebasis of the showing of good cause and any responsive pleadings.(ii) A petition to modify the terms and conditions of the combined licensewill be processed as a request for action in accord with 10 CFR 2.206.The petitioner shall file the petition with the Secretary of the Commission.Before the licensed activity allegedly affected by the petition (fuel loading,low power testing, etc.) commences, the Commission shall consider the petitionand determine whether any immediate action is required. If the petitionis granted, then an appropriate order will be issued. Fuel loading andoperation under the combined license will not be affected by the grantingof the petition unless the order is made immediately effective.(c) Prior to fuel loading, the Commission shall find that the acceptancecriteria in the combined license have been met and that, accordingly, thefacility has been constructed and will operate in conformity with the AtomicEnergy Act and the Commission's regulations. If the combined license isfor a modular design, each reactor module may require a separate findingas construction proceeds.<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendices A-L [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix M_Standardization of Design; Manufacture of Nuclear PowerReactors; Construction and Operation of Nuclear Power Reactors ManufacturedPursuant to Commission License</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 101 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, and andSection;50.10of this chapter require a Commission license to transfer or receive ininterstate commerce, manufacture, produce, transfer, acquire, possess,use, import, or export any production or utilization facility. The regulationsin Part 50 require the issuance of a construction permit by the Commissionbefore commencement of construction of a production or utilization facility,and the issuance of an operating license before operation of the facility.The provisions of Part 50 relating to the facility licensing process are,in general, predicated on the assumption that the facility will be assembledand constructed on the site at which it is to be operated. In those circumstances,both facility design and site-related issues can be considered in the initial,construction permit stage of the licensing process.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">However, under the Atomic Energy Act, a license may be sought andissued authorizing the manufacture of facilities but not their constructionand installation at the sites on which the facilities are to be operated.Prior to the ``commencement of construction'', as defined in andSection;50.10(c)of this chapter of a facility (manufactured pursuant to such a Commissionlicense) on the site at which it is to operate_that is preparation of thesite and installation of the facility_a construction permit that, amongother things, reflects approval of the site on which the facility is tobe operated, must be issued by the Commission. This appendix sets out theparticular requirements and provisions applicable to such situations wherenuclear power reactors to be manufactured pursuant to a Commission licenseand subsequently installed at the site pursuant to a Commission constructionpermit, are of the type described in andSection;50.22 of this chapter. Itthus codifies one approach to the standardization of nuclear power reactors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Except as otherwise specified in this appendix or as the contextotherwise indicates, the provisions in Part 50 applicable to constructionpermits, including the requirement in andSection;50.58 of this chapter forreview of the application by the Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguardsand the holding of a public hearing, apply in context, with respect tomatters of radiological health and safety, environmental protection, andthe common defense and security, to licenses pursuant to this AppendixM to manufacture nuclear power reactors (manufacturing licenses) to beoperated at sites not identified in the license application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. An application for a manufacturing license pursuant to this AppendixM must be submitted, as specified in andSection;50.4 of this chapter andmeet all the requirements of andSection;andSection;50.34(a) (1)-(9) and 50.34a(a) and (b) of this chapter except that the preliminary safety analysisreport shall be designated as a ``design report'' and any required informationor analyses relating to site matters shall be predicated on postulatedsite parameters which must be specified in the application. The applicationmust also include information pertaining to design features of the proposedreactor(s) that affect plans for coping with emergencies in the operationof the reactor(s).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. An applicant for a manufacturing license pursuant to this AppendixM shall submit with his application an environmental report as requiredof applicants for construction permits in accordance with Subpart A ofPart 51 of this chapter, provided, however, that such report shall be directedat the manufacture of the reactor(s) at the manufacturing site; and, ingeneral terms, at the construction and operation of the reactor(s) at ahypothetical site or sites having characterisitics that fall within thepostulated site parameters. The related draft and final environmental impactstatement prepared by the Commission's regulatory staff will be similarlydirected.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. (a) Sections 50.10 (b) and (c), 50.12(b), 50.23, 50.30(d), 50.34(a)(10),50.34a(c), 50.35 (a) and (c), 50.40(a), 50.45, 50.55(d), 50.56 of thischapter and Appendix J of Part 50 do not apply to manufacturing licenses.Appendices E and H of Part 50 apply to manufacturing licenses only to theextent that the requirements of these appendices involve facility designfeatures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) The financial information submitted pursuant to andSection;50.33(f)of this chapter and Appendix C of Part 50 shall be directed at a demonstrationof the financial qualifications of the applicant for the manufacturinglicense to carry out the manufacturing activity for which the license issought.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. The Commission may issue a license to manufacture one or more nuclearpower reactors to be operated at sites not identified in the license applicationif the Commission finds that:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) The applicant has described the proposed design of and the siteparameters postulated for the reactor(s), including, but not limited to,the principal architectural and engineering criteria for the design, andhas identified the major features of components incorporated therein forthe protection of the health and safety of the public.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Such further technical or design information as may be requiredto complete the design report and which can reasonably be left for laterconsideration, will be supplied in a supplement to the design report.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Safety features or components, if any, which require researchand development have been described by the applicant and the applicanthas identified, and there will be conducted a research and developmentprogram reasonably designed to resolve any safety questions associatedwith such features of components; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) On the basis of the foregoing, there is reasonable assurance that(i) such safety questions will be satisfactorily resolved before any ofthe proposed nuclear power reactor(s) are removed from the manufacturingsite and (ii) taking into consideration the site criteria contained inPart 100 of this chapter, the proposed reactor(s) can be constructed andoperated at sites having characteristics that fall within the site parameterspostulated for the design of the reactor(s) without undue risk to the healthand safety of the public.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) The applicant is technically and financially qualified to designand manufacture the proposed nuclear power reactor(s).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) The issuance of a license to the applicant will not be inimicalto the common defense and security or to the health and safety of the public.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) On the basis of the evaluations and analyses of the environmentaleffects of the proposed action required by Subpart A of Part 51 of thischapter and paragraph 3 of this Appendix, the action called for is theissuance of the license.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>When an applicant has supplied initially all of the technicalinformation required to complete the application, including the final designof the reactor(s), the findings required for the issuance of the licensewill be appropriately modified to reflect that fact.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Each manufacturing license issued pursuant to this appendix willspecify the number of nuclear power reactors authorized to be manufacturedand the latest date for the completion of the manufacture of all such reactors.Upon good cause shown, the Commission will extend such completion datefor a reasonable period of time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. The holder of a manufacturing license issued pursuant to this AppendixM shall submit to the Commission the final design of the nuclear powerreactor(s) covered by the license as soon as such design has been completed.Such submittal shall be in the form of an application for amendment ofthe manufacturing license.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. The prohibition in andSection; 50.10(c) of this chapter against commencementof construction of a production or utilization facility prior to issuanceof a construction permit applies to the transport of a nuclear power reactor(s)manufactured pursuant to this appendix from the manufacturing facilityto the site at which the reactor(s) will be installed and operated. Inaddition, such nuclear power reactor(s) shall not be removed from the manufacturingsite until the final design of the reactor(s) has been approved by theCommission in accordance with paragraph 7.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. An application for a permit to construct a nuclear power reactor(s)which is the subject of an application for a manufacturing license pursuantto this Appendix M need not contain such information or analyses as havepreviously been submitted to the Commission in connection with the applicationfor a manufacturing license, but shall by andSection;andSection; 50.34(a) and50.34a of this chapter, sufficient information to demonstrate that thesite on which the reactor(s) is to be operated falls within the postulatedsite parameters specified in the relevant manufacturing license application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. The Commission may issue a permit to construct a nuclear powerreactor(s) which is the subject of an application for a manufacturing licensepursuant to this Appendix M if the Commission (a) finds that the site onwhich the reactor is to be operated falls within the postulated site parametersspecified in the relevant application for a manufacturing license and (b)makes the findings otherwise required by Part 50. In no event will a constructionpermit be issued until the relevant manufacturing license has been issued.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. An operating license for a nuclear power reactor(s) that has beenmanufactured under a Commission license issued pursuant to this AppendixM may be issued by the Commission pursuant to andSection; 50.57 and SubpartA of Part 51 of this chapter except that the Commission shall find, pursuantto andSection; 50.57(a)(1), that construction of the reactor(s) has beensubstantially completed in conformity with both the manufacturing licenseand the construction permit and the applications therefor, as amended,and the provisions of the Act, and the rules and regulations of the Commission.Notwithstanding the other provisions of this paragraph, no applicationfor an operating license for a nuclear power reactor(s) that has been manufacturedunder a Commission license issued pursuant to this Appendix M will be docketeduntil the application for an amendment to the relevant manufacturing licenserequired by paragraph 7 has been docketed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. In making the findings required by this part for the issuanceof a construction permit or an operating license for a nuclear power reactor(s)that has been manufactured under a Commission license issued pursuant tothis appendix, or an amendment to such a manufacturing license, constructionpermit, or operating license, the Commission will treat as resolved thosematters which have been resolved at an earlier stage of the licensing process,unless there exists significant new information that substantially affectsthe conclusion(s) reached at the earlier stage or other good cause.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix N_Standardization of Nuclear Power Plant Designs: LicensesTo Construct and Operate Nuclear Power Reactors of Duplicate Design atMultiple Sites</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Section 101 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, and andSection;50.10 of this chapter require a Commission license to transfer or receivein interstate commerce, manufacture, produce, transfer, acquire, possess,use, import or export any production or utilization facility. The regulationsin Part 50 require the issuance of a construction permit by the Commissionbefore commencement of construction of a production or utilization facility,except as provided in andSection; 50.10(e) of this chapter, and the issuanceof an operating license before the operation of the facility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Commission's regulations in Part 2 of this chapter specificallyprovide for the holding of hearings on particular issues separately fromother issues involved in hearings in licensing proceedings (andSection; 2.761a,Appendix A, section I(c)), and for the consolidation of adjudicatory proceedingsand of the presentations of parties in adjudicatory proceedings such aslicensing proceedings (andSection;andSection; 2.715a, 2.716).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This appendix sets out the particular requirements and provisionsapplicable to situations in which applications are filed by one or moreapplicants for licenses to construct and operate nuclear power reactorsof essentially the same design to be located at different sites.\1\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ If the design for the power reactor(s) proposed in a particularapplication is not identical to the others, that application may not beprocessed under this appendix and Subpart D of Part 2 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="21">1. Except as otherwise specified in this appendix or as the contextotherwise indicates, the provisions of Part 50, applicable to constructionpermits and operating licenses, including the requirement in andSection;50.58 of this chapter for review of the application by the Advisory Committeeon Reactor Safeguards and the holding of public hearings, apply to constructionpermits and operating license subject to this Appendix N.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Applications for construction permits submitted pursuant to thisAppendix must include the information required by andSection;andSection; 50.33,50.33a, 50.34(a) and 50.34a (a) and (b) of this chapter, and be submittedas specified in andSection; 50.4 of this chapter. The applicant shall alsosubmit the information required by andSection; 51.50 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the technical information required by andSection;andSection; 50.34(a)(1) through (5) and (8) and 50.34a (a) and (b) of this chapter, referencemay be made to a single preliminary safety analysis of the design \2\<NOTE/> which, for the purposes of andSection; 50.34(a)(1) includesone set of site parameters postulated for the design of the reactors, andan analysis and evaluation of the reactors in terms of such postulatedsite parameters. Such single preliminary safety analysis shall also includeinformation pertaining to design features of the proposed reactors thataffect plans for coping with emergencies in the operation of the reactors,and shall describe the quality assurance program with respect to aspectsof design, fabrication, procurement and construction that are common toall of the reactors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ As used in this appendix, the design of a nuclear powerreactor included in a single referenced safety analysis report means thedesign of those structures, systems and components important to radiologicalhealth and safety and the common defense and security.<ITAG tagnum="21">3. Applications for operating licenses submitted pursuant to thisAppendix N shall include the information required by andSection;andSection;50.33, 50.34 (b) and (c), and 50.34a(c) of this chapter. The applicantshall also submit the information required by andSection; 51.53 of this chapter.For the technical information required by andSection;andSection; 50.34(b) (2)through (5) and 50.34a(c), reference may be made to a single final safetyanalysis of the design.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix O_Standardization of Design: Staff Review of Standard Designs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This appendix sets out procedures for the filing, staff review andreferral to the Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguards of standard designsfor a nuclear power reactor of the type described in andSection; 50.22 ofthis chapter or major portions thereof. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Any person may submit a proposed preliminary of final standarddesign for a nuclear power reactor of the type described in andSection; 50.22to the regulatory staff for its review. Such a submittal may consist ofeither the preliminary or final design for the entire reactor facilityor the preliminary or final design of major portions thereof.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The submittal for review of the standard design must be made inthe same manner and in the same number of copies as provided in andSection;andSection;50.4and 50.30 of this chapter for license applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The submittal for review of the standard design shall include theinformation described in andSection;andSection; 50.33 (a) through (d) of thischapter and the applicable technical information required by andSection;andSection;50.34 (a) and (b), as appropriate, and 50.34a of this chapter (other thanthat required by andSection;andSection; 50.34(a) (6) and (10), 50.34(b)(1),(6) (i), (ii), (iv), and (v) and 50.34(b) (7) and (8)). The submittal shallalso include a description, analysis and evaluation of the interfaces betweenthe submitted design and the balance of the nuclear power plant. With respectto the requirements of andSection;andSection; 50.34(a)(1) of this chapter,the submittal for review of a standard design shall include the site parameterspostulated for the design, and an analysis and evaluation of the designin terms of such postulated site parameters. The information submittedpursuant to andSection; 50.34(a)(7) of this chapter, shall be limted to thequality assurance program to be applied to the design, procurement andfabrication of the structures, systems, and components for which designreview has been requested and the information submitted pursuant to andSection;50.34(a)(9) of this chapter shall be limited to the qualifications of theperson submitting the standard design to design the reactor or major portionthereof. The submittal shall also include information pertaining to designfeatures that affect plans for coping with emergencies in the operationof the reactor or major portion thereof.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Once the regulatory staff has initiated a technical review of asubmittal under this appendix, the submittal will be referred to the AdvisoryCommittee on Reactor Safeguards (ACRS) for a review and report.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Upon completion of their review of a submittal under this appendix,the regulatory staff shall publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a determination as to whether or not the preliminaryor final design is acceptable, subject to such conditions as may be appropriate,and make available in the Public Document Room an analysis of the designin the form of a report. An approved design shall be utilized by and reliedupon by the regulatory staff and the ACRS in their review of any individualfacility license application which incorporates by reference a design approvedin accordance with this paragraph unless there exists significant new informationwhich substantially affects the earlier determination or other good cause.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. The determination and report by the regulatory staff shall notconstitute a commitment to issue a permit or license, or in any way affectthe authority of the Commission, Atomic Safety and Licensing Appeal Panel,Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, and other presiding officers inany proceeding under Subpart G of Part 2 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Information requests to the approval holder regarding an approveddesign shall be evaluated prior to issuance to ensure that the burden tobe imposed on respondents is justified in view of the potential safetysignificance of the issue to be addressed in the requested information.Each such evaluation performed by the NRC staff shall be in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.54(f) and shall be approved by the Executive Director forOperations or his or her designee prior to issuance of the request.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix P [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix Q_Pre-Application Early Review of Site Suitability Issues</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This appendix sets out procedures for the filing, Staff review, andreferral to the Advisory Committee on Reactor Safeguards (ACRS) of requestsfor early review of one or more site suitability issues relating to theconstruction and operation of certain utilization facilities separatelyfrom and prior to the submittal of applications for construction permitsfor the facilities. The appendix also sets out procedures for the preparationand issuance of Staff Site Reports and for their incorporation by referencein applications for the construction and operation of certain utilizationfacilities. The utilization facilities are those which are subject to andSection;51.20(b) of this chapter and are of the type specified in andSection; 50.21(b)(2) or (3) or andSection; 50.22 of this chapter or are testing facilities.This appendix does not apply to proceedings conducted pursuant to SubpartF or Part 2 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Any person may submit information regarding one or more site suitabilityissues to the Commission's Staff for its review separately from and priorto an application for a construction permit for a facility. Such a submittalshall be accompanied by any fee required by Part 170 of this chapter andshall consist of the portion of the information required of applicantsfor construction permits by andSection;andSection; 50.33 (a)-(c) and (e) ofthis chapter, and, insofar as it relates to the issue(s) of site suitabilityfor which early review is sought, by andSection;andSection; 50.34(a)(1) and50.30(f) of this chapter, except that information with respect to operationof the facility at the projected initial power level need not be supplied.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The submittal for early review of site suitability issue(s) mustbe made in the same manner and in the same number of copies as providedin andSection;andSection; 50.4 and 50.30 of this chapter for license applications.The submittal must include sufficient information concerning range of postulatedfacility design and operation parameters to enable the Staff to performthe requested review of site suitability issues. The submittal must containsuggested conclusions on the issues of site suitability submitted for reviewand must be accompanied by a statement of the bases or the reasons forthose conclusions. The submittal must also list, to the extent possible,any long-range objectives for ultimate development of the site, state whetherany site selection process was used in preparing the submittal, describeany site selection process used, and explain what consideration, if any,was given to alternative sites.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The staff shall publish a note of docketing of the submittal inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4>, and shall send a copy of the notice of docketingto the Governor or other appropriate official of the State in which thesite is located. This notice shall identify the location of the site, brieflydescribe the site suitability issue(s) under review, and invite commentsfrom Federal, State, and local agencies and interested persons within 120days of publication or such other time as may be specified, for considerationby the staff in connection with the initiation or outcome of the reviewand, if appropriate by the ACRS, in connection with the outcome of theirreview. The person requesting review shall serve a copy of the submittalon the Governor or other appropriate official of the State in which thesite is located, and on the chief executive of the municipality in whichthe site is located or, if the site is not located in a municipality, onthe chief executive of the county. The portion of the submittal containinginformation requested of applicants for construction permits by andSection;andSection;50.33 (a)-(c) and (e) and 50.34(a)(1) of this chapter will be referredto the ACRS for a review and report. There will be no referral to the ACRSunless early review of the site safety issues under andSection; 50.34(a)(1)is requested.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Upon completion of review by the staff and, if appropriate by theACRS, of a submittal under this appendix, the staff shall prepare a StaffSite Report which shall identify the location of the site, state the sitesuitability issues reviewed, explain the nature and scope of the review,state the conclusions of the staff regarding the issues reviewed and statethe reasons for those conclusions. Upon issuance of a Staff Site Report,the staff shall publish a notice of the availability of the report in the<T4>Federal Register</T4> and shall place copies of the report in the Commission'sPublic Document at 2120 L Street NW., Lower Level (Room LL-6), Washington,DC 20037, and in a Local Public Document Room(s) located near the siteidentified in the Staff Site Report. The staff shall also send a copy ofthe report to the Governor or other appropriate official of the State inwhich the site is located, and to the chief executive of the municipalityin which the site is located or, if the site is not located in a municipality,to the chief executive of the county.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Any Staff Site Report prepared and issued in accordance with thisappendix may be incorporated by reference, as appropriate, in an applicationfor a construction permit for a utilization facility which is subject toandSection; 51.20(b) of this chapter and is of the type specific in andSection;50.21(b) (2) or (3) or andSection; 50.22 of this chapter or is a testingfacility. The conclusions of the Staff Site Report will be reexamined bythe staff where five years or more have elapsed between the issuance ofthe Staff Site Report and its incorporation by reference in a constructionpermit application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Issuance of a Staff Site Report shall not constitute a commitmentto issue a permit or license, to permit on-site work under andSection; 50.10(e)of this chapter, or in any way affect the authority of the Commission,Atomic Safety and Licensing Appeal Panel, Atomic Safety and Licensing BoardPanel, and other presiding officers in any proceeding under Subpart F and/orG of Part 2 of this chapter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. The staff will not conduct more than one review of site suitabilityissues with regard to a particular site prior to the full constructionpermit review required by Subpart A of Part 51 of this chapter. The staffmay decline to prepare and issue a Staff Site Report in response to a submittalunder this appendix where it appears that, (a) in cases where no reviewof the relative merits of the submitted site and alternative sites underSubpart A of Part 51 of this chapter is requested, there is a reasonablelikelihood that further staff review would identify one or more preferablealternative sites and the staff review of one or more site suitabilityissues would lead to an irreversible and irretrievable commitment of resourcesprior to the submittal of the analysis of alternative sites in the EnvironmentalReport that would prejudice the later review and decision on alternativesites under Subpart F and/or G of Part 2 and Subpart A of Part 51 of thischapter; or (b) in cases where, in the judgment of the staff, early reviewof any site suitability issue or issues would not be in the public interest,considering (1) the degree of likelihood that any early findings on thoseissues would retain their validity in later reviews, (2) the objections,if any, of cognizant state or local government agencies to the conductof an early review on those issues, and (3) the possible effect on thepublic interest of having an early, if not necessarily conclusive, resolutionof those issues.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 2_RULES OF PRACTICE FOR DOMESTIC LICENSING PROCEEDINGS</ITAG>2. The authority citation for Part 2 continues to read in part as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 161, 68 Stat. 948, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2201);sec. 201, 88 Stat. 1242, as amended (42 U.S.C. 5841).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.110</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>3. In paragraph (a)(1), the reference to Appendix O of Part 50 is amendedto refer to Appendix O of Part 52, and in paragraph (a)(2) the referenceto Appendix Q of Part 50 is amended to refer to Appendix Q of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.400</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>4. The reference to Appendix N of Part 50 is amended to refer to AppendixN of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.401</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>5. In the heading and paragraph (a), the references to Appendix N of Part50 are amended to refer to Appendix N of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.402</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>6. In paragraph (a), the reference to Appendix N of Part 50 is amendedto refer to Appendix N of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.403</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>7. In the heading and paragraph (a), the references to Appendix N of Part50 are amended to refer to Appendix N of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.404</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>8. In the heading and text of the section, the references to Appendix Nof Part 50 are amended to refer to Appendix N of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.406</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>9. The reference to Appendix N of Part 50 is amended to refer to AppendixN of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>10. The reference to Appendix M of Part 50 is amended to refer to AppendixM of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>11. In the heading and paragraph (a), the references to Appendix M of Part50 are amended to refer to Appendix M of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 2.502</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>12. In the heading and text of the section, the references to AppendixM of Part 50 are amended to refer to Appendix M of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 50_DOMESTIC LICENSING OF PRODUCTION AND UTILIZATION FACILITIES</ITAG>13. The authority citation for Part 50 continues to read in part as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 161, 68 Stat. 948, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2201);sec. 201, 88 Stat. 1242, as amended (42 U.S.C. 5841).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 50.109</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>14. In paragraph (a)(1)(iv), the references to Appendices M, N and O ofPart 50 are amended to refer to Appendices M, N and O of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 51_ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION REGULATIONS FOR DOMESTIC LICENSINGAND RELATED REGULATORY FUNCTIONS</ITAG>15. The authority citation for Part 51 continues to read in part as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Section 161, 68 Stat. 948, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2201);sec. 201, 88 Stat. 1242, as amended (42 U.S.C. 5841).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 51.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>16. In paragraph (a)(6), the reference to Appendix M of Part 50 is amendedto refer to Appendix M of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 51.54</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>17. The reference to Appendix M of Part 50 is amended to refer to AppendixM of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 51.55</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>18. In paragraph (b), the reference to Appendix M of Part 50 is amendedto refer to Appendix M of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 51.76</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>19. The reference to Appendix M of Part 50 is amended to refer to AppendixM of Part 52.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 51.77</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>20. The reference to 10 CFR Part 50, Appendix M is amended to refer to10 CFR Part 52, Appendix M.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 170_FEES FOR FACILITIES AND MATERIALS LICENSES AND OTHER REGULATORYSERVICES UNDER THE ATOMIC ENERGY ACT OF 1954, AS AMENDED</ITAG>The authority citation for Part 170 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>31 U.S.C. 9701, 96 Stat. 1051; sec. 301, Pub. L. 92-314,86 Stat. 222 (42 U.S.C. 2201w); sec. 201, 88 Stat. 1242, as amended (42U.S.C. 5841).</ITAG>21. Section 170.2 is amended by revising paragraphs (g) and (k) to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(g) An applicant for or holder of a production or utilization facilityconstruction permit, operating license, or manufacturing license issuedpursuant to Part 50 of this chapter, or an early site permit, standarddesign certification, or combined license issued pursuant to Part 52 ofthis chapter;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(k) Applying for or already has applied for review, under 10 CFR Part 52,Appendix Q, of a facility site prior to the submission of an applicationfor a construction permit;<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>22. Section 170.3 is amended by revising paragraph (l) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(l) ``Manufacturing license'' means a license pursuant to Appendix M ofPart 52 of this chapter to manufacture a nuclear power reactor(s) to beoperated at sites not identified in the license application.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>23. Section 170.12 is amended by revising paragraphs (b), (d), and (e)(2)to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Payment of fees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>License fees. </T3>Fees for applications for permits and licenses thatare subject to fees based on the full cost of the review are payable uponnotification by the Commission. Except as provided below, each applicantwill be billed at six-month intervals for all accumulated costs for eachapplication the applicant has on file for review by the Commission untilthe review is completed. There is no application fee for early site permitsissued under 10 CFR Part 52. Fees for the review of an application foran early site permit are deferred as follows: The permit holder shall paythe applicable fees for the permit at the time an application for a constructionpermit or combined license referencing the early site permit is filed.If, at the end of the initial period of the permit, no facility applicationreferencing the early site permit has been docketed, the permit holdershall pay any outstanding fees for the permit. Each bill must identifythe applications and costs related to each. Fees for applications for materialslicenses not subject to full cost recovery must accompany the applicationwhen it is filed.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) <T3>Renewal fees. </T3>(1) Fees for applications for renewals that aresubject to full cost of the review are payable upon notification by theCommission. There is no fee for an application for renewal of an earlysite permit or a standard design certification issued under 10 CFR Part52. Each applicant other than an applicant for renewal of an early sitepermit or a standard design certification will be billed at six-month intervalsfor all accumulated costs on each application that the applicant has onfile for review by the Commission until the review is completed. Each billmust identify the applications and the costs related to each.(2) Fees for review of an application for renewal of a standard designcertification shall be deferred as follows: The full cost of review fora renewed standard design certification must be paid by the applicant forrenewal or other entity supplying the design to an applicant for a constructionpermit, combined license issued under Part 52, or operating license, asappropriate, in five (5) equal installments; an installment is payableeach of the first five times the renewed certification is referenced inan application for a construction permit, combined license, or operatinglicense. The applicant for renewal shall pay the installment, unless anotherentity is supplying the design to the applicant for the construction permit,combined license, or operating license, in which case the other entityshall pay the installment. If the design is not referenced, or if all costsare not recovered, within ten years after the date of renewal of the certification,the applicant for renewal shall pay the costs for the review of the applicationfor renewal, or remainder of those costs, at that time.(3) Fees for the review of an application for renewal of an early sitepermit shall be deferred as follows: The holder of the renewed permit shallpay the applicable fees for the renewed permit at the time an applicationfor a construction permit or combined license referencing the permit isfiled. If, at the end of the renewal period of the permit, no facilityapplication referencing the early site permit has been docketed, the permitholder shall pay any outstanding fees for the permit.(4) Renewal fees for materials licenses and approvals not subject to fullcost review must accompany the application when it is filed.(e) <T3>Approval fees.</T3><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2)(i) There is no application fee for standardized design approvals orcertifications issued under 10 CFR Part 52. The full cost of review fora standardized design approval or certification must be paid by the holderof the design approval, the applicant for certification, or other entitysupplying the design to an applicant for a construction permit, combinedlicense issued under Part 52, or operating license, as appropriate, infive (5) equal installments. An installment is payable each of the firstfive times the approved/certified design is referenced in an applicationfor a construction permit, combined license issued under 10 CFR Part 52,or operating license. In the case of a standard design certification, theapplicant for certification shall pay the installment, unless another entityis supplying the design to the applicant for the construction permit, combinedlicense, or operating license, in which case the other entity shall paythe installment.(ii)(A) In the case of a design which has been approved but not certifiedand for which no application for certification is pending, if the designis not referenced, or if all costs are not recovered, within five yearsafter the date of the preliminary design approval (PDA) or the final designapproval (FDA), the applicant shall pay the costs, or remainder of thosecosts, at that time;(B) In the case of a design which has been approved and for which an applicationfor certification is pending, no fees are due until after the certificationis granted. If the design is not referenced, or if all costs are not recovered,within ten years after the date of certification, the applicant shall paythe costs, or remainder of those costs, at that time.(C) In the case of a design for which a certification has been granted,if the design is not referenced, or if all costs are not recovered, withinten years after the date of the certification, the applicant shall paythe costs for the review of the application, or remainder of those costs,at that time.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>23. Section 170.21 is amended by amending the Schedule of Facility Feesby revising Part A. Nuclear Power Reactors, revising foot note 4, and addinga new second entry to Part F. Advanced Reactors to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 170.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Schedule of fees for production and utilization facilities, reviewof standard reference design approvals, special projects, and inspections.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1,i1,s100,r10 </C><T4>Schedule of Facility Fees </T4><ITAG tagnum="96">(See footnotes at end of table) </ITAG><H1>Facility categories and type of fees </H1><H1>Fees </H1>1, 2<ITAG tagnum="25">. Nuclear Power Reactors</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Application for Construction Permit <D>$125,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Early Site Permit, Construction Permit, Combined License, OperatingLicense <D>Full Cost. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Amendment, Renewal, Dismantling-Decommissioning and Termination, OtherApprovals <D>Full Cost. </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inspections 3 <D>Full Cost.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">* * * * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">F. Advanced Reactors</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Application for Construction Permit <D>$125,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Early Site Permit, Construction Permit, Combined License, OperatingLicense <D>Full Cost.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28">* * * * * * *</ITAG><F>\1\ Fees will not be charged for orders issued by the Commission pursuantto andSection; 2.204 of this chapter nor for amendments resulting specificallyfrom such Commission orders. Fees will be charged for approvals issuedpursuant to a specific exemption provision of the Commission's requlationsunder Title 10 of the Code of Federal Regulations (e.g. andSection;andSection;50.12, 73.5) and any other sections now or hereafter in effect regardlessof whether the approval is in the form of a license amendment, letter ofapproval, safety evaluation report, or other form. Fees for licenses inthis schedule that are initially issued for less than full power are basedon review through the issuance of a full power license (generally fullpower is considered 100% of the facility's full rated power). Thus, ifa licensee received a low power license or a temporary license for lessthan full power and subsequently receives full power authority (by wayof license amendment or otherwise), the total costs for the license willbe determined thorugh that period when authority is granted for full poweroperating power operation. If a situation arises in which the Commissiondetermines that full operating power for a particular facility should beless than 100% of full rated power, the total costs for the license willbe at that decided lower operating power level and not at the 100% capacity.</F><F>\2\ All charges will be based on expenditures for professional stafftime and appropriate contractual support services. However, in no eventwill the charges be less than the application fee or, where no applicationfee is specified, will charges be less than $150. For those applicationscurrently in file, the professional staff hours expended for the reviewof the application up to the effective date of this rule will be determinedat the professional rates established for the June 20, 1984 rule. For thoseapplications currently on file for which review costs have reached an applicablefee ceiling established by the June 20, 1984 rule, but are still pendingcompletion of the review, the costs incurred after the ceiling was reachedup to the effective date of this rule will not be billed to the applicant.Any professional hours expended on or after the effective date of thisrule will be assessed at the rate established by andSection; 170.20. Thisrate will be reviewed and adjusted annually as necessary to take into considerationincreased or decreased costs to the Commission. If such rate increasesor decreases in a given fiscal year, the new rate will be published inthe </F><T4>Federal Register.</T4> In the event a review covers a combination oflicensing actions in a one-step licensing process such as a combined constructionpermit and operating license review (interim, temporary, or other), thefees charged will be the total of the costs for the licensing action. <F>\3\ Inspections covered by this schedule are both routine and non-routinesafety and safeguards inspections performed by NRC for the purpose of reviewor followup of a licensed program. Inspections are performed throughoutthe full term of the license to ensure that the authorized activities arebeing conducted in accordance with the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended,other legislation, Commission regulations or orders, and the term and conditionsof the license. Non-routine inspections that result from third-party allegationswill not be subject to fees. </F><F>\4\ Collection of the review costs for a preliminary design approval(PDA) and final design approval (FDA) are deferred, respectively, for aperiod of five years from the approval; except that, if the design is referencedduring that period, 20 percent of the total costs will be payable by theholder of the design approval or certificate as each reference is madeuntil the full costs are paid. If the design is certified, the five yeardeferral period is extended to 10 years from the certification, with thesame proviso that 20 percent of the costs will be payable each time thedesign is referenced. In the event the full costs are not recovered bythe end of the applicable deferral period, the holder of the design approvalor certificate must pay the remainder of any costs not previously recoveredby the NRC. For more on the schedules for payment of fees for reviews ofapplications for PDAs, FDAs, standard design certifications, and renewalsof certifications, see andSection;andSection; 170.12 (d) and (e) of this part.Applications for amendments to PDAs, FDAs, and certifications are subjectto full costs and will be billed upon completion of the review.</F></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, MD, this 7th day of April 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Samuel J. Chilk, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of the Commission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-8832 Filed 4-17-89; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>